Occupy Offshoot Aims to Erase People’s Debts  
Thanksgiving Help Line: Is it safe to cook a turkey from the Reagan era?  (Spoiler: no, don't do that) 
Pumpkin pie deconstructed and put back together  
It's still hard to get movies made, even if you're Robert De Niro  
Chris Christie Reverses Stand on Tax Hikes After Storm  
Army Seeks Death Penalty for Robert Bales in Massacre  
At Microsoft, Sinofsky Seen as Smart but Abrasive  
Man who accused Elmo puppeteer of underage sexual relationship takes back claim  
The Lede Blog: Leaked Report on Sri Lanka Critical of U.N.  
Stockholm Journal: Swedish School De-emphasizes Gender Lines  
Tampa Social Scene at Center of Petraeus Scandal  
Thanksgiving Help Line: Don't want gelatinous cranberry sauce in the shape of a can? Alternate recipes:  
Media Decoder Blog: Times Newsroom Employees Vote to Accept New Contract  
Jordan Faces Protests After Gas-Price Proposal  
Will Obama agree to Medicare and Social Security cuts? He already has, writes  
Petraeus case sets off alarms about Americans' privacy in the digital era  
What questions do you have about your upcoming Thanksgiving feast? Tweet them w/ #AskNYT and will answer:  
City Room: Osborne Apartments Official Toasted for Work as Crane Boom Dangled  
Restaurant Review: Guy’s American Kitchen & Bar in Times Square  
NYT restaurant critic has a few questions for  
Changing of the Guard: China’s Princelings Wield Influence to Shape Politics  
Introducing the new Premium Crossword experience:  Play with friends, access classic puzzles & more. 
Media Decoder Blog: Accuser Recants Claim Against Elmo Puppeteer  
Accuser of Kevin Clash, Elmo puppeteer, takes back claim of underage sexual relationship  
Alternate side parking to resume Wednesday in most of NYC  
Active duty military members shouldn't have to spend time arguing with student loan servicing companies, right?  
Photos of the day: Recovery from the storm in the Rockaways, a mass wedding in Kyrgyzstan and more  
Updated: Obama expresses support for commander in Afghanistan investigated over e-mails  
The Brooklyn-Battery Tunnel is partly reopening to cars this afternoon  
Political Times: Will Obama Agree to Entitlement Cuts? He Already Has  
A Heart-Thumping Ride on a Racing Catamaran  
France Recognizes New Syrian Rebel Group, Hints It May Provide Weapons  
Deconstructing a slice of pumpkin pie and putting it back together  
Advice about being out and home for the holidays from  
Interactive: Turn to NYT's annual Thanksgiving Help Line for advice on planning your Turkey Day  
Robert De Niro on the Art of the Long Career  
Boat stranded by storm in Queens awaits a tow off road after two weeks  
Petraeus Case Raises Concerns About Americans’ Privacy  
Paul Ryan expresses surprise at turnout for Democrats in "urban areas"  
Video: The Petraeus scandal widens, the fiscal cliff and more on TimesCast Politics  
David Durk, Detective Who Exposed Police Corruption, Dies at 77  
Media Decoder Blog: New Editor for a Shrinking Washington Post  
An expanded push for same-sex marriage might be coming soon to your state  
Consider giving your turkey a sauna treatment this Thanksgiving  
What Michael saved and tossed when #Sandy's surge flooded his home  
Tainted Water in California Farmworker Communities  
U.S. military is struggling with incidents of poor judgment, malfeasance and sexual improprieties from leaders  
BBC Begins Disciplinary Action After McAlpine Reporting Debacle  
British Leaders Oppose Bail for Preacher Abu Qatada  
Democrats like a Romney idea on income taxes  
Investigation of Petraeus expands to include top U.S. commander in Afghanistan  
Advocates of Gay Marriage Extend Their Campaign  
Charlie Beljan’s Panic Leads to Hospital and Then PGA Title  
It’s the Economy: What the Penguin-Random Merger Says About the Future of the Book Business  
Critic’s Notebook: Call of Duty: Black Ops II and Halo 4  
Federal Flood Insurance Program Faces New Stress  
Concern Grows Over Top Military Officers’ Ethics  
Democrats Like a Romney Idea to Cap Tax Deductions  
After Tsunami, Grief and the Joy of Basketball  
Top U.S. Commander in Afghanistan Is Linked to Petraeus Scandal  
Top U.S. Commander in Afghanistan Is Linked to Petraeus Scandal  
Angry Turkish Secularists Plant Flag at Ergenekon Trial  
Steamed Turkey, the Jacques Pépin Way  
After several years of growth, text messaging declined in the U.S. for the first time  
Pockets of Misery Persist 2 Weeks After Hurricane Sandy  
We give you an A. 
Report: U.S. will be world's leading oil producer by about 2017, become a net oil exporter by 2030  
Bits Blog: After Overhaul, Windows Chief Leaving Microsoft  
Top Candidates to Replace Clinton at State Dept. May Face Hurdles  
False Posts on Facebook Undermine Its Credibility  
When parents shoulder the student debt and fall on tough times:  
Tribal Crime Rises, but Washington Still Pulls Back  
Finally, a place in Brazil where dogs can go for discreet sex  (@viaSimonRomero) 
‘Dream Team’ of Behavioral Scientists Advised Obama Campaign  
Media Decoder: NBC Moves to Shake Up 'Today' Leadership  
Ismail Khan, Powerful Afghan, Stokes Concern in Kabul  
China Mandates ‘Social Risk’ Reviews for Big Projects  
Photo from The Lively Morgue: A rehearsal for the Rogers and Hammerstein musical "Allegro" in 1947  
Isotope Analysis Provides Clues in a Florida Cold Case  
Bruce Bent Sr. and Son Cleared of Fraud Charges  
The Appraisal: Displaced by Storm, Couple Seeks Rental With Access to Chicken Coop  
City Room: Gas Rationing in New Jersey to End Tuesday  
Herman Wouk on His New Book, ‘The Lawgiver’  
Report Sees U.S. as Top Oil Producer, Overtaking Saudi Arabia, in 5 Years  
Hu Jintao’s Military Role in China Uncertain as Congress Winds Down  
Timeline Shows F.B.I. Discovered Petraeus Affair in Summer  
Sidebar: Post-Trial Evidence Is Issue in Supreme Court Case  
Erik Weihenmayer, a Blind Adventurer, Prepares to Challenge Colorado River in a Kayak  
The Lakers Change Direction and Hire Mike D’Antoni as Coach  
Responding to Mortar Fire, Israel Strikes Syrian Artillery Units  
Lens Blog: Joel Meyerowitz Black and White in Color  
Israel Reports 'Direct Hits' on Targets in Syria  
On Election Night, Fox chose news over advocacy by  
DealBook: Leucadia to Buy Jefferies in $3.6 Billion Deal  
Greece Approves Austerity Budget in Bid for Foreign Aid  
Radical Preacher Abu Qatada Wins Appeal  
Displaced by Hurricane, Queens Football Team Gets to Playoffs  
Syrian Jet Strikes Close to Border With Turkey  
Some Parents, Shouldering Student Loans, Fall on Tough Times  
U.S. Fears Hezbollah Operative Held in Iraq May Go Free  
The New Islamists: Tunisia Battles Over Pulpits and a Revolution’s Legacy  
Petraeus Replacement Search Is Under Way  
MSNBC, Its Ratings Rising, Gains Ground on Fox News  
BBC Turmoil Spreads as More Executives Step Aside  
Belo Horizonte Journal: Animalle Mundo Pet, a Motel for Tail-Wagging Romance  
Lakers Hire D’Antoni as New Coach, Agent Says  
Music Review: 30 Bands Perform in Jazz & Colors at Central Park  
On Pro Football: Falcons’ Loss of Perfect Record Recalls Important Lesson  
Spain Evictions Create an Austerity Homeless Crisis  
Cuomo to Seek $30 Billion in Aid for Storm Relief  
Washington Memo: Legacy at Stake, Obama Plans Broader Push for Budget Deal  
U.S. Officials Say Petraeus’s Affair Known in Summer  
Construction Site Offers Fleeting Glimpse of the Civil War Past  
Hurricane Sandy and the Disaster-Preparedness Economy  
Charts: Which groups did Obama and Romney win and lose in the election? Answers here:  
15 Inmates Escaped From New Jersey Halfway House During Hurricane Sandy  
Television Review: Oliver Stone’s ‘Untold’ American History, on Showtime  
U.S. Seeks Pool of Vacant Units From N.Y.C. Landlords  
The Media Equation: Fox News’s Election Coverage Followed Journalistic Instincts  
Bits Blog: Online Voting in U.S., Despite Risks, Should Be Developed  
First, Republicans Must Find Common Ground Among Themselves  
China’s Banking Leaders Seek to Calm Concerns Over Revived Growth  
A Chocolate Tour of the Caribbean  
Hurricane Sandy Inflicted a Beating on New York City Trees  
Lawyers for Robert Bales Question Lone Gunman Claim  
Greece Takes Aim at Tax Evasion Among Wealthy  
Utilities Push Ahead With Restoring Power in New York Area After Storm  
BBC, Shaken by Bungled Report, Needs Radical Overhaul, Its Chairman Says  
Political Memo: A Vote for Unlimited Campaign Financing  
Beyond Paula Broadwell’s TV Interviews, a Family-Focused Life  
Lawmakers Question F.B.I. Handling of Petraeus Affair  
Syrian Opposition Groups Sign Unity Deal  
Susan Mary Alsop: a Two-Continent Hostess  
Data Points: The Building Blocks of Re-election  
In Virginia’s Hills, a Football Crusade  
Modern Love: A Spanking Fetish Is Not Revealed Easily  
Texas Officers’ Truck Chase Is Under Inquiry  
How a Staten Island Community Became a Deathtrap  
News Analysis: Elizabeth Warren, Known, and Maybe Feared, on National Stage  
Capital Ideas: The Cliff Is a Hard Place to Compromise  
‘Lunch Atop a Skyscraper’ Uncovered  
Boehner Tells House G.O.P. to Fall in Line  
As Coal Boosts Mozambique, The Rural Poor Are Left Behind  
Cultural Studies: Hurricane Sandy Reveals a Life Unplugged  
Changing of the Guard: Chinese Communist Party Faces Calls for Democracy  
Abdul Wasi Hamdard, Afghan Artist Admired Everywhere but Home  
Lens: Dick Taylor's Decades as a Harness Horse Trainer  
Error-Prone Alabama Falls to Texas A&M  
U.S. Military’s New Focus on Asia Becomes Clearer  
Gerritsen Beach, Home to Emergency Workers, Is Still Reeling From the Storm  
FiveThirtyEight: Which Polls Fared Best (and Worst) in the 2012 Presidential Race  
Digital Domain: Online Merchants Again Pursue Same-Day Delivery Service  
In Hurricane Sandy’s Wake, the Peddlers Move In  
Political Memo: In Digital Era, Affairs Like Petraeus’s Are Harder to Cover Up  
Long-Ago Jimmy Savile Abuse Complaint Is Heeded  
Drink: Turn Your Autumn Apples Into Cocktails  
The Quad | Live Blog: Syracuse Tops Louisville; Alabama Battling Texas A&M  
George Entwistle Resigns as Head of BBC  
Breaking News: BBC Reports George Entwistle, Its Director General, Has Resigned
 
Florida to Address Delays as It Confirms Obama Victory  
On Basketball: Knicks and Lakers: Contrast for the Ages  
Syrian National Council Resists Unification With Other Groups  
Christian conservatives reel as cultural tide appears to shift against them  
F.B.I. Said to Have Stumbled Into News of David Petraeus Affair  
Texas Monthly: Backed by Dead Man’s Kin, a Steadfast Denial of Guilt in Texas  
Where FEMA Fell Short, Occupy Sandy Was There  
If you had $20 million to inspire someone to solve a problem for humankind, what would it be? Tell us here:  
David Petraeus, Seen as an Invincible C.I.A. Director, Self-Destructs  
Why New York is facing a gasoline shortage  
FBI investigation uncovered evidence of David Petraeus's extramarital affair  
Linked to Petraeus, Paula Broadwell is a lifelong high achiever  
Who helped you get through the storm? Tell us on City Room blog:  
27 Inmates Killed in Sri Lanka Prison Shootout  
In Robert Bales Hearing, Afghans Tell of Killings  
Character Study: For Every Character, a Different Storm Story  
Black Friday Deals Will Start Earlier This Year  
Knicks 104, Mavericks 94: Knicks Rely on Offense to Defeat Mavericks and Move to 4-0  
Queens Nursing Home Is Faulted Over Care After Storm  
DealBook: Citigroup Awards $6.65 Million to Pandit  
Democrats Likely to Win Supermajority in California Legislature  
The Brownstone Revisionists  
City Room: Odd-Even License Plate Rules Have a History  
David Henry Hwang, the Man Who Can Make Bruce Lee Talk  
Crime Scene: Chasing a Post-Storm Boogeyman Through Neighborhoods Gone Dark  
Christian Conservatives Failed to Sway Voters  
Music Review: ‘Un Ballo in Maschera,’ at the Metropolitan Opera  
Manila Hospital Awaits Reproductive Health Bill’s Fate  
Storm Showed Vulnerability of City’s Tunnels  
Q. and A.: Rockstar’s Dan Houser on Grand Theft Auto V  
Fickle Wisconsin Sends Tammy Baldwin, Trusty Progressive, to Senate  
Fickle Wisconsin Sends Tammy Baldwin, Trusty Progressive, to Senate  
Linked to Petraeus, Paula Broadwell Is Lifelong High Achiever  
If you had $20 million to inspire someone to solve a problem for humankind, what would it be? Tell us here:  
Palestinians Renew Push for Enhanced U.N. Status  
Republicans Reconsider Positions on Immigration  
In New York Gas Shortage, Missed Opportunities and Diverted Focus  
How Zara Grew Into the World's Largest Fashion Retailer  
#FF 500 New York Times journalists on Twitter:  
U.S. Extends Deadline on Health Coverage for States  
Your Money: After the Storm: Managing Your Homeowner’s Claim  
Supreme Court to Revisit Voting Rights Act  
Educated Chinese Are Silent Amid Tibetan Self-Immolations  
Lens Blog: Bahrain and More — Pictures of the Day  
Photos of the day: Clashes in Bahrain, President Obama's first post-election remarks and more  
Incoming Lockheed Martin chief resigns over relationship with a subordinate  
Lee MacPhail, Executive Who Led American League, Dies at 95  
The storm meant couldn't share your Jack-O-Lantern photos last week, but it's still pumpkin season isn't it?  
Justices to Review Racial Protections in Voting Rights Act  
Book review of "Oddly Normal" by a memoir about raising a gay son  
Petraeus on CIA resignation: "After being married for over 37 years, I showed extremely poor judgment..."  
David Petraeus's full resignation letter to CIA staff  
Lakers Fire Coach Mike Brown After 1-4 Start  
Citing Affair, Petraeus Resigns as C.I.A. Director  
Past NYT reporting on David H. Petraeus  
Breaking News: David H. Petraeus Resigns as Director of Central Intelligence Agency
 
The Caucus: Boehner Digs In on Opposition to Tax Hikes for Wealthy  
The Coming Tax Changes for Individuals  
ArtsBeat: Philip Roth Says He's Done Writing  
How do you make over the Playboy Bunny costume for India? with some answers:  
Obama and Boehner Circle Each Other on Budget Impasse  
Watch live now: President Obama delivers his first public post-election remarks  
Malaria Vaccine Candidate Produces Disappointing Results in Clinical Trial  
Komen Foundation Works to Regain Support After Planned Parenthood Controversy  
Iran Confirms Drone Shooting Episode  
For Mitt Romney, all his career options are open. Except one.  
Video: Obama chokes up during thank you to his campaign staff  
How Zara Grew Into the World’s Largest Fashion Retailer  
Syrian Refugee Flow Escalates Sharply  
Voters hand defeat to Democratic and Republican incumbents campaigning under ethical clouds  
Bloomberg on gas rationing: "There's no guarantee that odd/even is going to make a big difference."  
Latest updates as odd/even gas rationing gets underway in NYC at City Room blog  
#FF 500 New York Times journalists on Twitter:  
DealBook: Britain Opens Inquiry on HSBC Over Tax Haven  
Heavy Lending Creates a Surge in Chinese Economy  
Bishop of Durham Appointed as Archbishop of Canterbury  
Voters Oust Lawmakers Accused of Ethics Violations  
In Syria, Missteps by Rebels Erode Their Support  
Theater Review: ‘Annie,’ Starring Katie Finneran, at the Palace Theater  
The One World Futbol Promises a Lasting Source of Fun in Poor Countries  
Putin Presses Overhaul of Top Military Leaders  
Putin Reshuffles Top Russian Military Officers  
New York Subways Find Magic in Speedy Hurricane Recovery  
In Michigan, a Setback for Unions  
Moscow Journal: Russia’s New Museum Offers Friendly Message to Jews  
Popular Wrench Fights a Chinese Rival  
Japan Seeks Tighter Pact With U.S. to Confront China  
When Thugs and Hustlers Ruled Dark Alleys in New York  
Video: Sam Mendes on making Skyfall, the latest James Bond movie  
The Oklahoma City Thunder's Fairy-Tale Rise  
Navy SEALs Said to Be Punished for Breach  
Wixom, Mich., Shooting Suspect Is Arrested  
For Romney, All His Career Options Are Still Open. Except One.  
New York City Imposes Gas Rationing to Ease Shortage  
The Rolling Stones at 50 Prepare to Tour  
News Analysis: For Obama, Housing Policy Presents Second-Term Headaches  
In Red Hook, Closure of Fairway Leaves Nearby Shops Anxious  
Congress Sees Rising Urgency on Fiscal Deal  
FiveThirtyEight: As Nation and Parties Change, Republicans Are at an Electoral College Disadvantage  
Movie Review: 'Lincoln,' by Steven Spielberg, Stars Daniel Day-Lewis  
Hu Jintao Tries to Cement Legacy Opposing Change  
Video: Will Shortz's tips for crossword puzzle beginners  
States face tight health care deadlines after Obama's re-election  
After the storm, Statue of Liberty and Ellis Island remain cut off from visitors  
Yale Names Insider, Peter Salovey, Its New President  
Army Private in WikiLeaks Case Offers Partial Guilty Plea  
Executive Tied to New Jersey’s Halfway Houses, William J. Palatucci, Is Stepping Down  
Romney aide says campaign has lost Florida to Obama  
Photos of the day: Remains after the fire in Breezy Point, Queens, three giraffes in a Sydney zoo and more  
FiveThirtyEight: As Nation and Parties Change, Republicans Are at an Electoral College Disadvantage  
Pentagon Says Iran Fired at Surveillance Drone Last Week  
City Room: Bloomberg Imposes Odd-Even Gas Rationing  
Video: Sam Mendes on making Skyfall, the latest James Bond movie  
Mayor Bloomberg imposes odd-even gas rationing on New York City. Details here:  
Breaking News: Mayor Bloomberg Imposes Odd-Even Gas Rationing Starting Friday, as Does Long Island
 
The Oklahoma City Thunder’s Fairy-Tale Rise  
Update: Jared Loughner sentenced to life in prison for killing 6 and injuring 13, including Gabby Giffords  
Breaking News: Jared L. Loughner, Who Killed 6 and Wounded Representative Gabrielle Giffords, Sentenced 
 
States Face Tight Health Care Deadlines  
Photo: The storm was stressful for many living things around New York. But not for Mitik the walrus  
Obama’s Quiet Return to the White House  
Watch live now: Marijuana legalization in Colorado, the post-election fiscal cliff and more on TimesCast Politics  
President Obama has stayed out of sight since returning to the White House  
Mitt Romney reflects on the campaign at breakfast with aides  
Pop: The Rolling Stones at 50 Prepare to Tour  
Video: A medical marijuana grower in Montana faces life in prison. New Op-Doc via  
Gunman Who Shot Giffords to Be Sentenced  
On Parks and Recreation, will play  (link corrected) 
Follow for updates from the sentencing in Arizona of Jared Loughner who killed 6 and injured 13, including Gabby Giffords 
Should New York spend tens of billions of dollars on a hurricane barrier?  
An intimate look inside China's Communist Party Congress  
Obama to Visit Myanmar  
Interactive: What Obama's re-election could mean for major U.S. industries  
Follow the latest on the aftermath of #Sandy and last night's Northeaster on City Room blog  
Maybe you've heard of the "Freshman 15." This week, it's the #Sandy Five  
Graphic: The money race for the most expensive election in U.S. history  
Assad Warns Against Foreign Intervention in Syria  
Movie Review: ‘Lincoln,’ by Steven Spielberg, Stars Daniel Day-Lewis  
Euro Zone Interest Rate Remains Unchanged  
Assad Does Not Foresee Foreign Intervention in Syria  
Tool Kit: How to Devise Passwords That Drive Hackers Away  
Women’s Issues Were a Problem for G.O.P.  
Euro Watch: Markets Subdued in Advance of News on Euro  
Vermont School Cut Off From Technology Faces Its Intrusion  
Maker of Anti-Islam Video Gets Prison Term  
Books of The Times: ‘Mr. Penumbra’s 24-Hour Bookstore’ by Robin Sloan  
Gas Shortage Persists in N.Y.C. and Nassau County  
Apple Stock Sinks as Profits and Products Are Questioned  
Rove’s On-Air Rebuttal of Fox Ohio Vote Call Raises Questions About His Role  
Obama’s Victory Presents G.O.P. With Demographic Test  
Obama Campaign Clawed Back After a Dismal Debate  
At Home With Robert Greene: Robert Greene on Renovating Like a Master  
President Obama Begins Work on Second Term  
After Hurricane Sandy, Debating Costly Sea Barriers in New York Area  
Interactive: What President Obama's election could mean for major U.S. industries  
What a man! What a suit! 'Skyfall,' with Daniel Craig as James Bond reviewed  
Turkey May Deploy Patriot Missiles Near Syria  
Plus-sized fashion bloggers inspire other women with their pride in wearing sizes in the double digits  
Obama's Other 'Cliff' Is in Foreign Policy  
Little to Show for Cash Flood by Big Donors  
Jiang Zemin, Ex-Leader of China, Reasserting Sway  
Netanyahu Rushes to Repair Damage With President  
Greek Parliament Holds, Barely, on More Austerity  
Rome Journal: Rome Drawn Into Tiff Between Preservationists and Cat Shelter  
Cuomo Fires New York’s Emergency Management Chief  
China's Communist Party Congress sets its agenda ahead of transition  
Lens Blog: Ghana and More — Pictures of the Day  
Latest updates on the northeaster and recovery from the last storm on City Room blog  
Northeaster storm knocks out power to 11,000 Con Ed customers around New York  
Greece Narrowly Passes Crucial Austerity Bill  
Afghan Militia Members Found Guilty in Rape  
Boehner speaks the day after Obama is re-elected: "Mr. President, this is your moment."  
When your GPS steers you the wrong way  
Pictures of the day: A department store collapse in Ghana, getting ready for the cold in New York and more  
Latest updates on the New York area's storm recovery and the challenges it faces  
Movie Review: ‘Skyfall,’ With Daniel Craig as James Bond  
Latest: Democrats have likely raised Senate majority to 55 seats with North Dakota win  
Graphic: How Obama won re-election  
Video: The GOP.'s electoral paths forward, Obama's cabinet and more on TimesCast Politics  
Agenda Set for Party Congress Marking Transition  
Photo: Caught bootlegging in Minneapolis, April 10, 1924  
Northeaster Brings More Rain and Wind to Area Hit by Hurricane Sandy  
Hostility Lingers Over Handling of New York City Marathon’s Cancellation  
Back to Bargaining Table, With Fiscal Cliff Dead Ahead  
Same-Sex Marriage Gains Cheer Gay Rights Advocates  
Video: The challenges ahead for President Obama's second term and more on TimesCast Politics  
News Analysis: Obama Wins a Clear Victory, but Balance of Power Is Unchanged in Washington  
Darrell Royal, Texas Coach Who Pioneered Wishbone Offense, Dies at 88  
U.S. Affirms Tariffs Against Chinese Solar Companies  
Graphic: How Obama won re-election  
Reminder: We're providing free, unlimited access to election coverage on  and our mobile apps today. 
Officials Brace as Northeaster Threatens the New York Area  
Maine and Maryland Voters Approve Same-Sex Marriage  
Fiscal Impasse Leads to Pullback After Election  
Katie Holmes and Norbert Leo Butz in ‘Dead Accounts’  
Republicans Grapple for Answers After Loss  
We are providing free, unlimited access to election coverage on  and our mobile apps until 6 p.m. 
Some Hurricane Sandy Evacuees Are Set Adrift Again  
Republicans Stand Firm in Keeping Control of House  
In the South, a Good Year for Farmers of Peanuts  
Mortar Attacks Shake Damascus as Envoys Issue Warnings  
Obama Victory Brings a Welcome for the Familiar Abroad  
Video: Watch Nate Silver, a k a explain his election forecast  
Barack Obama: "We remain more than a collection of red states and blue states. We are, and forever will be, the United States of America." 
Barack Obama: "We are an American family, and we rise and fall together as one nation and as one people." 
Watch live now: President Obama delivers his victory speech in Chicago  
In Maine, a historic victory for same-sex marriage at the ballot box  
Sneak peek: Page One of The New York Times, Nov. 7, 2012  
Video: Nate Silver of discusses the election results and his forecast model  
Mitt Romney: "I pray that the president will be successful in guiding our nation." 
Watch live now: Mitt Romney is expected to deliver his concession speech  
For President Obama, now comes a second chance. Will he swing for the fences?  
NYT homepage: Obama's Night  
Breaking News: President Barack Obama Wins Re-election, The New York Times Projects
 
Breaking News: President Obama Is Re-elected to Second Term, Networks Project
 
Breaking News: Democrats Will Retain Control of U.S. Senate, and Republicans the House, The NYT Projects
 
Breaking News: Senator Claire McCaskill Defeats Todd Akin, Republican, in Missouri, The NYT Projects
 
Breaking News: Elizabeth Warren, Democrat, Defeats Senator Scott Brown in Massachusetts, NYT Projects
 
Live video now: Nate Silver of analyzes early results  
Fill in results from battleground states, see remaining paths to victory for Romney and Obama:  
Breaking News: Obama Wins New Hampshire, The NYT Projects
 
Breaking News: Obama Wins Wisconsin, Networks Project  
Breaking News: Joe Donnelly, Democrat, Defeats Richard E. Mourdock for Indiana Senate Seat, The NYT Proj
 
From live-blog: Obama leads in Florida bellwether counties  
Obama Wins Pennsylvania, Networks Project  (link fixed) 
Breaking News: Obama Wins Pennsylvania, Networks Report
 
Follow our election feed, for key election developments tonight. 
Breaking News: Democrat Christopher S. Murphy Defeats Linda McMahon for Connecticut Senate Seat, The NYT Projects  
Breaking News: Senator Kirsten Gillibrand is Re-elected in New York, The New York Times Projects  
Enjoy free unlimited access to election coverage on  and its mobile apps until 6 p.m. ET Wednesday. 
Changing of the Guard: Facing Protests, China’s Business Investment May Be Cooling  
Keep track of which states the NYT, and networks have called:  
Follow for more election coverage. Full updates, analysis & results posted here:  
Live video now: NYT reporters and editors prepare you for the results to come in  
What's your mood this Election Day in one word? See what other NYT readers picked, or add your own:  
Enjoy free unlimited access to election coverage on  and its mobile apps for the next 24 hours. 
Readers are sharing their Election Day Instagrams with #NYTelection. Some of our favorites:  
The Caucus: Live Coverage of Election Day  
After Sandy, displaced NY/NJ residents go to great lengths to vote:  
Follow for more election coverage. Full updates, analysis & results posted here:  
DealBook: An Election Guide for Wall Street  
Cecilia Chang, Ex-Dean of St. John’s, Found Dead  
Greece to Vote on $23 Billion in New Cuts  
Latest Updates: New Challenges to Recovery, Including a Northeaster  
Teri Shields, mother and manager of Brooke Shields, dies at 79  
Restaurant Review: Restaurant Review: After Hurricane Sandy, Downtown Restaurants Need Patrons  
512 paths to the White House: Choose winners in swing states, see how Obama/Romney can get to 270  
Scene of South African Mine Shooting May Have Been Altered, Inquiry Is Told  
Live video now: Readying for results and voting challenges in New York  
If Ohio needs a recount, we may not know the winner until December  
Books of The Times: ‘Bruce,’ a Springsteen Biography, by Peter Ames Carlin  
China’s Security Ministry Suspected Neil Heywood, Slain British Businessman, Was a Spy  
Long Lines at Polling Places as Displaced Residents Find Ways to Vote  
Blast Rocks Iraq Military Base, Killing 26  
Presidential Campaign Over, Voters Take to the Polls  
Unlikely Model for H.I.V. Prevention: Adult Film Industry  
Car Bomb Near Iraqi Military Base Kills 27  
Ohio Law Could Bring Long Delays in a Recount  
Putin Dismisses Russian Defense Minister  
In Boardwalk Towns, a Way of Life Lies in Splinters  
Gunmen in Damascus Kill Brother of Parliament Speaker  
Putin Fires Defense Minister in Wake of Scandal  
Thousands of Greeks Strike Over Spending Cuts  
Hearing Begins for Robert Bales, Accused in Afghan Murders  
Ethnic Tension Drives Russian Crackdown on Rubber-Bullet Guns  
Silicon Valley Objects to Online Privacy Rule Proposals for Children  
FiveThirtyEight: Nov. 5: Late Poll Gains for Obama Leave Romney With Longer Odds  
In New Jersey, Halloween Is Canceled, Postponed and Redesigned  
Egyptian Vigilantes Crack Down on Abuse of Women  
I want my country to ____. See how your answers compare to the rest of America:  
An unlikely model for HIV prevention: The pornography industry  
Political Memo: State by State, Battle for Presidency Goes to Voters  
Stuffing Deserves More Days on the Table  
Amid Cleanup and Recovery, Scramble to Help the Displaced Cast Ballots  
Tag your Election Day Instagrams w/ #NYTelection. We'll feature them on the  home page.  
The best photos of the 2012 presidential campaign, week by week  
Luther Campbell, once of 2 Live Crew, is now a high school coach who tells players not to swear  
Video: Scenes from the Rockaways. "It's pandemonium. Everyone's just scratching trying to make it work."  
Housing Relocation Begins After Hurricane Sandy With Federal Aid  
East Coast Prepares for Northeaster  
Predict the results, build your own electoral map and share it with friends:  
Elliott Carter, Avant-Garde Composer, Dies at 103  
Mitt Romney: A challenger at the crossroads  
Barack Obama: A president's last race, win or lose  
Video: As other farm work has gotten safer, gruesome grain bin accidents persist  
South Carolina Tax Hacking Puts Other States on Alert  
Has Sandy affected your small business? Tell us how:  
Photos of the Day: New York recovery, violence in Syria and a witch doctor predicts the U.S. election  
Why do we cook stuffing only once a year?  
Why wait until January for the inaugural address? Assembling one now from previous speeches and campaign events:  
The newspaper endorsements that switched party from 2008:  
Lens Blog: New York and More – Pictures of the Day  
News Analysis: On Cable News Networks, a Battle of Bitterness  
It's not just the president. Notable races and ballot measures in all 50 states and D.C.:  
Breaking News: Governor Says New Yorkers Can Vote at Any Polling Place
 
On cable news networks, a battle of bitterness  
512 paths to the White House: Select the winner in battleground states to explore the scenarios  
Letter From Paris: A Historic Street Is Left With a Hole  
City Room: Storm Aftermath: Live Updates  
Students Earn Credit Working on Campaigns  
Mitt Romney will visit Ohio and Pennsylvania on Election Day:  
Murky Laws Give Fake Artworks a Future as Real Ones  
I want my country to ____. Compare your hopes for the U.S. and the president to those of other Americans:  
Lens Blog: Mugur Varzariu's Photos of Roma  
In 2009, Engineers Detailed Storm Surge Threat to New York City  
We agree! 
Video: The final moments of the 2012 campaign  
Sprint Through Swing States in Campaign’s Last Hours  
The Caucus: Campaign Diary: Candidates Spending Final Day in Swing States  
After Hurricane Sandy, Schools Reopen, While Transit Remains Hobbled  
In still-darkened NYC, a feeling of class-based abandonment:  
New York City Schools Reopen After Hurricane Sandy  
South Sudan Expels U.N. Rights Officer  
Syrian Rebels Claim to Kill Dozens of Soldiers  
Intense Fighting Erupts in Syrian Capital  
Tranquillity, Not Cheers or Hordes, Line New York City Marathon Route  
Shunning Amazon, Booksellers Resist a Transformation  
Obama Takes Frenetic, Final Campaign Days in Stride  
Romney, a Challenger at the Crossroads  
Damage Unclear, Future in Limbo for Some Buildings in Lower Manhattan  
Upper West Side Nanny Resented Her Employers, Police Say  
New York State Senate Races Tighter After Storm  
Chicago Project Follows What Happens to Juveniles  
FiveThirtyEight: State and National Polls Come Into Better Alignment  
Israeli Report Cites a Thwarted 2010 Move on Iran  
With Students Set to Return, Schools Face Tough Logistics  
In Still Dark Parts of New York, a Simmering Sense of Neglect  
Mark Thompson and BBC Missed Red Flags in Savile Scandal  
A Media Vow of Election Night Restraint Despite Social Media Clamor  
Bill Clinton Presses On in Campaign for Barack Obama  
Activist City Savors Role as Soda-tax Battleground  
U.S. Suicide Rate Rose During Recession, Study Finds  
Marathon Runners Embrace Chance to Help Storm-Stricken New Yorkers  
A Storm-Battered Supply Chain Threatens the Holiday Shopping Season  
New York Marathoners Hold Race of Their Own  
512 Paths to the White House  
The Caucus: Democrats Sue to Extend Florida's Early Voting  
Show Me Your Badge  
Charmaine Yoest’s Cheerful War on Abortion  
Big City: The Costs of Waterfront Living  
China’s Communist Party Expels Bo Xilai  
Freezing Temperatures Complicate Storm Recovery  
Unions Recruit Allies on Obama’s Behalf  
Candidates Make Final Dash as Race Winds Down  
FiveThirtyEight: Nov. 3: Romney's Reason to Play for Pennsylvania  
Bits Blog: How New Yorkers Adjusted to Sudden Smartphone Withdrawal  
Essay: Outside the Amtrak Window, a Picture of the U.S. Economy  
Too Fast, Too Soon? Young Endurance Runners Draw Cheers and Concerns  
After Getting Back to Normal, the Big Job Is to Face a New Reality  
Man Behind FEMA’s Makeover Built Philosophy on Preparation  
Google Casts a Big Shadow on Smaller Web Sites  
In Ohio, 2 Campaigns Offer a Study in Contrasts  
U.S.: The Ohio Ground Game  
Beck Acts as a Bridge Between Romney and Evangelical Christians  
Egypt’s Coptic Church Names New Pope  
Paul Ryan Is Said to be Planning an Active Role  
Benghazi Attack Raises Doubts About U.S. Abilities in Region  
Protecting New York City, Before Next Time  
Evoking 18th-Century Drama, Bounty Finds Storm Tragedy  
Police Helicopter Crash in Atlanta Kills Two Officers  
Canada Would Welcome Election Losers  
Nets 107, Raptors 100: Brooklyn Nets Beat Raptors in Season Opener  
Classical: David Alden’s ‘Un Ballo in Maschera’ at the Met  
Changing of the Guard: China’s Xi Jinping Would Be Force for U.S. to Contend With  
Jerry Brown Throws Himself Into Prop. 30 Vote  
After Deep Police Cuts, Sacramento Sees Rise in Crime  
Upper West Side Nanny Is Charged With Murder  
Roles Shift From Competitors to Tourists  
Dorm Offers Safe Haven for Commuter Students from Chicago’s South Side  
Romney Sweeps Through Four Events in Three States With 72 Hours to Go  
Reporter’s Notebook: Obama, on a Weekend March, Tries to Recapture His Mantle  
Neighborhood Joint | Kingsbridge: Bronx Ale House, for Devotees of Craft Beer and Running  
Gays in Pakistan Move Cautiously to Gain Acceptance  
Syria Rebels Attack Key Base in Bid to Disrupt Airstrikes  
Gas Rationing Is New Burden After Hurricane Sandy  
In New York, Stargazing in the Elevator  
On Pro Basketball: Knicks Begin Season Devoid of Jeremy Lin, and Youth  
Resilient Romania Finds Advantage in a Crisis  
Marathon’s Cancellation Sure to Carry Huge Costs  
Fractured Recovery a Week After Hurricane Sandy  
Obama and Romney Zero In on Battleground States  
FiveThirtyEight: Nov. 2: For Romney to Win, State Polls Must Be Statistically Biased  
Analysis: New York City Marathon Director’s Difficult Decision to Cancel Race  
Power Returns to Lower Manhattan  
News Analysis: The Vanishing Electoral Battleground  
Facebook Cancels Shortcut Over Concern for Security  
Pennsylvania Omitted Poison Data in Water Report  
For Obama, a Face More Careworn, a Crowd Less Joyful  
In Public Housing After Hurricane Sandy, Fear, Misery and Heroism  
Massive Open Online Courses Are Multiplying at a Rapid Pace  
Hurricane Sandy Threatens to Disrupt Voting on Election Day  
Anger Grows at the Red Cross Response to the Storm  
As Power Is Restored for Some, Others Face Grim Outlook  
Critic’s Notebook: The D.J. Calvin Harris Releases New Album, ‘18 Months’  
Iran Sanctions Take Toll on Medical Imports  
Senate Races Get Little Lift From Obama and Romney  
Point Pleasant Beach Journal: At the Jersey Shore a Shared Determination to Rebuild and Restore  
‘The Story of Ain’t,’ by David Skinner  
Knicks 104, Heat 84: Carmelo Anthony Sets Tone as Knicks Provide New York a Reason to Cheer  
On the NYC marathon: "This isn't the year or the time to run it."  
Do natural disasters really lead to more pregnancies? How about divorce rates?  
Second Illness Infects Meningitis Sufferers  
Photos: The most striking images from four days of destruction, frustration and recovery  
Photos: New Yorkers won't let a little lack of electricity keep them from their nightlife  
Sports of The Times: George Vecsey: Canceling the Marathon Was the Right Thing to Do  
Campaigns Have Strategy for Disagreeing Couples  
A Promising Drug With a Fatal Flaw  
Critic's Notebook: Chelsea Art Galleries Struggle to Restore and Reopen  
Critic’s Notebook: Lil Buck, a Jook Star From Memphis  
Obama or Romney? Use NYT's scenario builder to predict the election results then share your map:  
Petraeus’s Lower Profile at C.I.A. Leaves Void in Benghazi Furor  
Military to Deliver Fuel to Storm Region  
Breaking News: U.S. Military to Truck Fuel to Region Hit by Hurricane Sandy 
Lens Blog: Nightlife Carries On in Blackout New York  
Federal relief costs likely to be big, and contested:  
A Good Appetite: Making Sure Kale Gets a Raw Deal  
Twitter to add photo filters to compete with Instagram:  
New York City Marathon Will Not Be Held Sunday  
Breaking News: Power Returns for 67,000 Customers in Manhattan’s East Village Area
 
Breaking News: New York City Marathon Will Not Be Held Sunday
 
Photos of the day: Storm's aftermath in New York and New Jersey, stretching soldiers in Red Square and more  
Notable races and ballot measures in all 50 states and D.C.  
Erdogan Says He Plans a Trip to Gaza Soon  
Graphic: Current subway service in NYC  
Arizona Latinos Urged to Oust Sheriff Joe Arpaio  
FiveThirtyEight: The Simple Case for Saying Obama Is the Favorite  
Video: The Sweet Spot: Nov. 2  
Mayor Bloomberg: Con Ed hopes to restore power to most of Manhattan by midnight tonight. 
Bloomberg defends his decision to hold NYC Marathon  
Watch live now: Mayor Bloomberg's news conference on storm aftermath  
Axelrod Sets More Combative Tone for Obama in 2012  
New York City Marathon Presses On Amid Backlash  
Our Generation: The Night the Dune Failed Long Beach  
A candy-coated primer on the Electoral College by  
Photos: 3 days of scenes from the storm and its aftermath  
First Federal Dollars Allotted in Hurricane Sandy’s Aftermath  
Fuel ships arriving in New York Harbor, which should help reduce fuel shortages  
China’s Heavy Hand Smooths Way to Party Congress  
Graphic: What's open and what's closed? Track New York area institutions and services here  
Observatory: Surrounded by Humans, Korean Elephant Learns to ‘Speak’  
Why an elephant in South Korea learned to "speak"  
‘Thomas Jefferson: The Art of Power,’ by Jon Meacham  
U.S. added 171,000 jobs last month, showing persistent but modest improvement in the economy  
Lens Blog: Three Photographers Recall a 1996 Fall  
U.S. Added 171,000 Jobs in October  
Staten Island Was Tragic Epicenter of New York City’s Storm Casualties  
Breaking News: U.S. Added 171,000 Jobs in October; Unemployment Rate at 7.9%
 
U.N. Says Syria Execution Video Shows Apparent War Crime  
Gasoline Runs Short, Adding Woes to Storm Recovery  
Follow this morning and throughout the day for the latest post-storm information on NYC and the region. 
Secret Service Agent Who Hid Affair Kills Himself  
From Education Life: Affirmative Action: A Complicated Issue for Asian-Americans  
On Basketball: Proximity of Knicks and Nets Alone Does Not a Rivalry Make  
Video Said to Show Executions by Syrian Rebels  
Campaigns Brace to Sue for Votes in Crucial States  
Guinea-Bissau, After Coup, Is Drug-Trafficking Haven  
Shield of Celebrity Let Jimmy Savile Escape Scrutiny for Decades  
Bobby Hebert, Former Saint, Puts Outsize Imprint on Radio  
A New Buyer Appears for a Threatened Wright House  
Friction Between Wolf Hunters and Protectors Rises  
Critic's Notebook: CMA Awards — An Embrace of Country’s Megastars, With Past in the Rear View  
Media Decoder Blog: Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia to Lay Off Staff and Reduce Magazines  
Thanks. We appreciate it. 
Bloomberg Endorses Obama, Saying Hurricane Sandy Affected Decision  
What's open and running among New York City area services and transit:  
Among the dead in Staten Island: A 2-year-old swept away from his mother's arms.  
Op-Doc video: The black vote for and against gay marriage  
Before-and-after photos of the damage on the Jersey Shore:  
Exhibition Review: ‘Beatrix Potter: The Picture Letters’ at the Morgan  
.@NYGovCuomo was among the public officials to embrace social media during Sandy:  
Peanut butter is the best disaster food, and other lessons from a darkened Greenwich Village:  
The most striking photos from three days of destruction, frustration and recovery:  
At Bellevue, a Desperate Fight to Ensure the Patients’ Safety  
C.I.A. Played Major Defensive Role in Libya Attack  
Gasoline Runs Short, Adding Woes to Storm Recovery  
Video: Powerless Manhattan is lit by candles and $10 mini flashlights  
Officials defend decision not to cancel the New York City Marathon:  
Estimate of Economic Losses Now Up to $50 Billion  
Television Review: ‘SEAL Team Six,’ on National Geographic  
New York City Schools, Some Relocated, Are to Reopen Monday  
With Transportation Snarled in Brooklyn, Bicycles Roam Free  
Hungry City: Gran Eléctrica in Dumbo, Brooklyn  
Map: The current state of subway service in New York City  
Bloomberg Endorses Obama, Saying Hurricane Sandy Affected Decision  
Withdrawal of a Congressional Research Report on Tax Rates Raises Questions  
Breaking News: Mayor Bloomberg Endorses Obama for Re-Election, Citing Climate Change
 
Map: Track power failures after the storm, updated every 15 minutes  
New York City fatalities from storm rise to 38  
Above 40th Street, the Powerless Go to Recharge  
Officials Defend Decision to Run New York City Marathon in Storm’s Aftermath  
Atlantic City Mayor Is Left Off Obama and Christie Storm Tour  
Graham B. Spanier, Former Penn State President, Charged in Sandusky Case  
Live video now: Presidential campaign returns to full speed after pause for storm on TimesCast Politics  
China Presents Plan to End Syrian Conflict  
How Do You Raise a Prodigy?  
American Museums Tend to Tiptoe Around Politics  
Ex-President of Penn St. Charged in Sandusky Case  
New York City fatalities from storm at 37  
Watch live now: Mayor Bloomberg's news conference on the storm's aftermath  
thank you 
Lingering Unemployment Poses Long-Term Risk  
thanks for visiting us 
FiveThirtyEight: Obama’s Electoral College Firewall Holding in Polls  
Should Lindsey Vonn be allowed to ski against men? Officials will decide  
thank you 
thanks for visiting us 
China Urges Cease-Fire, Talks to End War in Syria  
Photos: Aerial views of the storm's impact along the Jersey Shore  
Jeremy Lin is victorious in debut with the Houston Rockets  
Watch live now: seeing the storm's full devastation in New Jersey, areas without power and more on TimesCast  
After Storm Hiatus, Presidential Race Is Back in Full Swing  
Get post-storm updates via text message (standard rates apply). Send the following text message to 40404: follow nytmetro 
Follow this morning for up-to-date information on the NYC commute. Tweet us your NYC commute story with #TellNYT 
After Hurricane Sandy, a Difficult Commute in New York  
Open or closed? Keep up with which New York area services and institutions are operating  
In case you wondered what happened to the subway rats:  
Teenage Bedroom as Battleground  
From Education Life: A New Kind of Tutoring Aims to Make Students Smarter  
New Dominion: Door-Knocking Army Tries to Tip Virginia Senate Race  
In Stunning About-face, Chris Christie Heaps Praise on Obama  
Political Memo: Romney Tones Down Campaign Rhetoric as Vote Nears  
Fearing Legal Claims, Bank Freezes Estate of Jimmy Savile  
Bellevue Hospital Evacuates Patients After Backup Power Fails  
‘Ex-Gay’ Men Fight View That Homosexuality Can’t Be Changed  
Marathon Photos Often Fail to Capture the Glory  
Ameridose Announces Recall Amid Questions About Drugs’ Sterility  
At Sandy's peak, Twitter was abuzz with activity. Trouble is, not all of it was true.  
Thousands of lab rats used in medical research were among the victims of Sandy:  
A time-lapse video from the 51st floor of the NYT building shows Sandy storm through Manhattan  
Photos: After Sandy, scenes of destruction, recovery and helping each other  
Open or closed? Track the current status of New York-area transit, services and institutions  
For Young Volunteers, Realism Is Trumping Idealism of ‘08  
Wary of Future, Professionals Leave China in Record Numbers  
Kabul Journal: Kabul Boxing Match Draws Cheering Throngs  
Breaking News: Cuomo Waives Fares on M.T.A. Rail, Subways and Buses on Thursday and Friday
 
Apple Shake-Up Could Mean End to Real-World Images in Software  
New Yorkers Cling to Hope of a Better Commute  
What happened to subway rats? Some likely drowned, but the strongest may emerge on the surface:  
What happened to subway rats? Some likely drowned, but the strongest may emerge on the surface:  
Obama Tours Storm-Ravaged New Jersey With Gov. Chris Christie  
The Caucus: Christie and Obama Tour Storm-Ravaged Coast and Exchange Compliments  
With the race set for Sunday, should the New York City Marathon take this year off?  
The New York Times is providing free unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps. 
Photos: Readers' photos of storm damage in the New York area, on a map  
NYC Marathon may cancel opening ceremony and 5K run  
New Jersey Continues to Cope With Hurricane Sandy  
Obama to New Jersey evacuees on Christie: "I want to let you know that your governor is working overtime."  
Schools closed for remainder of the week for students; Teachers should report on Friday  
Breaking News: Mayor Bloomberg Says Only Cars With 3 or More People May Use East River Bridges
 
Watch live now: Mayor news conference on the storm's aftermath  
Nets’ Opener Against Knicks in Brooklyn Is Postponed  
Architecture Review: Barclays Center Arena and Atlantic Yards Project in Brooklyn  
For Builders, the Storm Is Good for Business  
Full details on which NYC transit is restored and which continues to be suspended, via  
Watch live now: NYT reporters and editors ahead of Mayor news conference on the storm's aftermath  
DealBook: JPMorgan Sues Boss of Trader Who Lost Billions  
F.C.C. Details Cellphone Problems  
Syrian Air Raids Increase as Battle for Strategic Areas Intensifies, Rebels Say  
Why cellphone failures could get worse in the northeast region before they get better  
DealBook: Stocks Little Changed as Market Reopens  
Updated: Fatalities from the storm at 59, with 29 dead in New York  
Limited subway service to return Thursday to NYC, but no service below 34th Street in Manhattan:  
Graphic: Track which New York-area transit, services and institutions are open and closed  
Follow for the latest news and updates on the storm's aftermath. 
Breaking News: Limited Subway Service in New York to Return Thursday, Cuomo Says
 
Graphic: Assessing the damage from Hurricane #Sandy  
FiveThirtyEight: What State Polls Suggest About the National Vote  
Labor Report Due Friday on Schedule  
Due to the storm, The New York Times is providing free unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps. 
Photos: 42 scenes of storm damage, but also people coming together in and around New York  
Jobs report will be released on Friday despite storm  
Graphic: A close look at power failures in around NYC, updated every 15 minutes  
On Basketball: Amar’e Stoudemire’s Deal With Knicks Is Worst in New York Sports  
How #Sandy slapped the snark out of Twitter  
Superfans react to Disney buying "Star Wars" and LucasFIlm  
Victims of storm may face surprise over whether insurance covers damage  
NYC: Did you have a nightmare commute this AM? Tweet your tales of woe w/ #tellNYT and we might feature you on our blog. 
Before storm ravaged New York, years of warnings that it could happen here  
Wall Street Reopens With a Mild Gain  
Holiday Movies: Daniel Day-Lewis on Playing Abraham Lincoln  
For Flood Victims, Another Blow Is Possible  
Enjoy! 
You're welcome, and thank you! 
‘360 Sound’ Celebrates Columbia Records’ 125th Anniversary  
Euro Watch: Euro Zone Unemployment Hit New High in September  
Syria Activists Say Warplanes Hit Damascus Suburbs  
After Storm’s Destruction, Halting Return in Northeast  
For Years, Warnings That Storm Damage Could Ravage New York  
Outcry in Japan Over Diversion of Aid Funds  
DealBook: After Storm, Stock Exchanges Prepare to Open  
Mia Love, Mayor in Utah, Seeks Path to Congress  
Ban on Lasix at Breeders’ Cup Keeps Some Horsemen Away  
Poll Shows Ohio Working Class May Be Key to Obama Re-election  
Taliban Hits Region Seen as ‘Safest’ for Afghans  
Clinton Urges Bosnia’s Leaders to Work Together  
Wolfgang Puck, the Original Celebrity Chef, Is Still Keeping Busy  
A transplant patient's nerve-racking evacuation from the NYU hospital:  
Disney buys Lucasfilm and a commanding position in the world of fantasy movies  
In Lower Manhattan, Still Feeling the Effects of the Storm  
At least 40 people on the East Coast have died due to #Sandy. Here are a few of their stories.  
Graphic: Assessing the storm's damage  
Share your photos of storm damage in and around New York City  
Top photos of Hurricane Sandy aftermath:  
For years, scientists warned destruction in NYC was possible:  
Photos: Time-lapse of NYC's skies before and during the storm from our building's 51st floor  
ArtsBeat: Swift's 'Red' Tops a Million Sales in Week 1  
Wind-Driven Flames Reduce Scores of Homes to Embers In Queens Enclave  
From Education Life: A Wheelchair Tour of Morningside College in Sioux City, Iowa  
Did global warming contribute to Hurricane #Sandy's devastation?  
Oklahoma Prepares for Open Carry Gun Law  
Gay Marriage Supporters Hope to Win in 4 States  
Subways May Be Shut for Several Days After Hurricane Sandy  
The New York Times is providing free, unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps today. 
Video: Why some young people don't vote, and why they do. Watch a short Op-Doc film by  
.@HuffingtonPost and learned that when floodwaters rise, Web sites may fall:  
Get storm updates via text message (standard rates apply). Send the following text message to 40404: follow nytmetro 
Photos of the Day: The storm's aftermath in New York and New Jersey, a full moon festival in Myanmar and more  
At least 39 people have died due to Hurricane Sandy. Here are a few of their stories.  
Race Narrows as Campaign Enters Its Final Week  
Graphic: Assessing the storm's damage  
Watch live now: Mayor Bloomberg's news conference on the storm  
Hurricane Sandy’s Lethal Power, in Many Ways  
Full list of NY-area transit, institutions and airports that are operating or suspended here:  
Photos of the day: The storm's aftermath in New York and New Jersey, a full moon festival in Myanmar and more  
Update: As Disney buys Lucasfilm, it plans new "Star Wars" films starting in 2015  
Watch live now: Latest updates on the storm and its aftermath and more on TimesCast  
Photos: Time-lapse of NYC's skies before and during the storm from the NYT building's 51st floor  
Media Decoder Blog: Disney Buying Lucas Films for $4 Billion  
Disney buying LucasFilm for $4.05 billion  
"Community" to return to NBC on Feb. 7 and air on Thursdays at 8 PM ET  
Breaking News: Disney Acquiring George Lucas's Film Studio for $4 Billion  
Video: In Midtown Manhattan, some people worked straight through the storm  
President Obama to visit New Jersey on Wednesday with Gov. Chris Christie  
In Turkey, protests reveal a break from past traditions, reports:  
Polish Newspaper Report on 2010 Crash Causes Furor  
Power outages affect about 8.5 million American homes  
More than 8 million homes in the U.S. are now without power, post-storm:  
Graphic: Assessing the damage from Hurricane Sandy  
President Obama has authorized federal assistance to N.Y. and N.J., via  
The New York Times is providing free, unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps today. 
Bahrain Bans All Protests in New Crackdown  
Still Waiting for the Narrator in Chief  
Get storm updates via text message (standard rates apply). Send the following text message to 40404: follow nytmetro 
thank you! 
Updated: Death toll from storm rises to 38 across the country; 17 dead in New York  
Video: A couple in Stonington, CT battles the storm. "We could have stayed at home, until the flooding came."  
Blizzard conditions have spread over parts of Tennessee, W. Virginia, Maryland, Virginia & N. Carolina:  
Knicks-Nets N.B.A. season opener Thursday at Barclays Center in Brooklyn is in doubt after storm  
Share your photos of storm damage in and around New York City  
Will your insurance cover damage from #Sandy? Here's a refresher on hurricane deductibles and flood coverage  
Live video now: Latest on power failures and other storm effects, the election implications and more on TimesCast  
Updated: State-by-state guide to the storm from blog  
Storm Continues on a Path of Destruction  
New York Marathon officials are assessing the storm's effect on Sunday's race  
New York Stock Exchange to open on Wednesday  
Video: Why some young people don't vote, and why they do, an Op-Doc by  
How to Cook Everything: Risotto Takes On a Different Shade  
Breaking News: Bloomberg Closes Schools for 3rd Day; Says ‘4 or 5 Days’ Till Subway Service Restored 
Follow for live tweets on the storm, including Mayor Bloomberg's news conference, beginning soon. Watch:  
Afghan Election Date Is Set for 2014  
Hurricane Sandy Disrupts Millions of Lives  
Storm Pushes Presidential Race From Spotlight  
Follow for more #Sandy coverage, with full updates posted here:  
Graphic: Assessing the damage from Hurricane Sandy  
The New York Times is providing free, unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps today. 
MTA: After the worst storm in its 108-year history, no timetable for restoring subway service  
A six-alarm fire has engulfed several blocks in the Rockaways, 3 dead elsewhere in NYC  
Power Failures and Flooding Test Resolve in Lower Manhattan and Red Hook  
G.O.P. Turns Fire on Obama Pillar, Auto Bailout  
Bloomberg, Cuomo and Christie Display Different Styles in Storm Response  
Hurricane Sandy Barrels Region, Leaving Battered Path  
New Music: New Albums From Neil Young, Toby Keith and David Virelles  
DealBook: UBS to Cut 10,000 Jobs in Major Overhaul  
Swiss Bank UBS Announces Plan to Cut 10,000 Jobs  
Patients Evacuated From N.Y.U. Langone After Power Failure  
Sandy Expected to Be Less Powerful, and Less Drenching, as It Moves Inland  
Supreme Court Hears Challenge to Wiretaps Law  
In Colorado, Coffman and Miklosi Vie for Congress  
N.B.A.’s Biggest Stars Concentrated in Miami and Los Angeles  
Carl DeMaio, Gay Republican, Runs for San Diego Mayor  
Current view from 51st fl of the NYT building on 40th St. looking east. Many buildings at far right are without power.  
About 250,000 lose power in lower Manhattan.  
No Specific Warnings in Benghazi Attack  
Storm Overwhelms Atlantic City  
Breaking News: Storm Makes Landfall in New Jersey
 
Lady Liberty goes dark  
Photos of the day: Hurricane #Sandy leaves its marks, swans on the Elbe in Germany and more  
Awaiting Storm’s Price Tag  
Losses from #Sandy could range between $10 and $20 billion by one estimate  
Updated: State-by-state information on Hurricane #Sandy on Blog  
4 East River bridges are closing at 7 PM in NYC, and other regional bridge and road closures  
Bits Blog: In Shake-Up, Apple's Mobile Software and Retail Chiefs to Depart  
Watch live now: News conference from Mayor Bloomberg on Hurricane #Sandy  
On NYT's a state-by-state overview of storm conditions, transportation, evacuations:  
Crane Accident at One57 in Midtown  
The Lede Blog: David Barboza Answers Reader Questions on Reporting in China  
Crane Dangling Over West 57th Street  
"Sandy is pretty furious at Atlantic City. She must have lost a bet or something."  
Crane Dangling Over West 57th Street  
G.O.P. Tries to Chip Away at Democrats’ Edge in Early Voting  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 28: In Swing States, a Predictable Election?  
The New York Times is providing free, unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps today. 
Follow for #Sandy news, with full updates posted here:  
Attacks Continue During Failed Holiday Truce in Syria  
Books of The Times: Ross King’s Deconstructs Leonardo and ‘The Last Supper’  
Carrots Gain Bigger Roles at Some Restaurants  
Breaking News: Markets on Wall Street to Remain Shut on Tuesday
 
Media Decoder Blog: Anderson Cooper Talk Show Won't Return for a Third Season  
Watch live now: President Obama's news conference on Hurricane #Sandy  
Updated: State-by-state information about Hurricane #Sandy via Blog  
Storm Roils Campaign as Obama Cancels Florida Appearance  
Latest: Romney cancels Monday and Tuesday campaign events in the face of Hurricane #Sandy  
Which newspapers have switched endorsements from Obama to Romney? Which has Obama gained? Track them here:  
NYC schools to remain closed, and subways and buses are not expected to be running  
Watch live now: News conference from Mayor Bloomberg in New York City on Hurricane #Sandy  
Photo, via showing Hurricane #Sandy from space at 9 a.m. ET:  
Scientists Move Closer to a Long-Lasting Flu Vaccine  
Latest: Holland Tunnel and Brooklyn Battery Tunnel to close at 2 PM  
Watch: A new photo of New York's sky every 60 seconds from atop The New York Times Building  
U.S. Tries to Coordinate Anti-Militant Push in Mali  
Shallow waters and an unusual path may worsen Sandy's storm surge:  
Meteorologist on #Sandy: "One of the biggest storms of our lifetimes is unfolding right now."  
Lens Blog: Arthur Grace's Photos of American Life  
The New York Times is providing free unlimited access to storm coverage on  and its mobile apps today. 
Follow for live tweets on the arrival of the storm in New York City 
Map: Find Hurricane #Sandy shelters and evacuation sites in New York City's five boroughs  
Obama skips campaign rally in Florida to monitor conditions in Washington  
Send your Hurricane #Sandy photos, and visit our gallery of what readers have already sent us:  
Our reporters are posting the latest NYC-area news on the storm here:  
Visit our state-by-state guide to information on Hurricane #Sandy  
Black Churches in Florida Urge Congregations to Vote  
Cameras on the 51st floor of the NYT building are capturing the skies ahead of Hurricane #Sandy, updating every minute:  
Hurricane Sandy Predicted to Bring ‘Life-Threatening’ Surge  
The Media Equation: Chasing Lance Armstrong’s Misdeeds From the Sidelines  
Random House and Penguin to Be Combined  
City Room: The Day: Refusing to Give Credit Where Credit Is, Perhaps, Due  
Obama Is Even in TV Ad Race Despite PACs  
On U.S. Farms, Deaths in Silos Persist  
On Baseball: Tigers’ Stars Went to Sleep After A.L.C.S. Sweep  
Syria Warplanes Raid Damascus Suburb on Last Truce Day  
Syrian Truce Fades as Air Force Bombs Cities  
Bertelsmann and Pearson to Merge Book Businesses  
Memo From Afghanistan: In Afghanistan, Comment on Border Brings Tension  
The Lede Blog: State-by-State Guide to Hurricane Sandy  
Giants 4, Tigers 3, 10 Innings: Giants Sweep Tigers to Win Second World Series Title in Three Years  
Sports Alert: San Franciso Giants Win World Series After Sweeping Detroit Tigers
 
The Giants lead the Tigers 4-3 going into the bottom of the 10th in the World Series. Will Detroit come back?  
Watch New York's skies ahead of Hurricane #Sandy from a camera on the NYT building  
California Boy Comes to Trial in Killing of Neo-Nazi Father  
Dolphins 30, Jets 9: Jets Flop in All Phases in Loss to Dolphins  
Massachusetts Shuts Down Another Compounder  
Shallow Waters and Unusual Path May Worsen Surge  
For Evacuees, Panic, or Nonchalance  
Utilities Will Focus on a Rapid Recovery  
Bats: Updates: World Series Game 4, Giants 1, Tigers 0  
Barclays Center Attracts Cabs to Brooklyn  
Eat: Four Ways to Cook a Pumpkin, No Matter How You Slice It  
Bits Blog: I.B.M. Reports Nanotube Chip Breakthrough  
Are you in the NYC region preparing for #Sandy? Our reporters and editors are taking your storm questions. Tweet them w/ #AskNYT 
Map: It's not too late to evacuate. See if you're in Zone A and find shelters in all 5 boroughs  
Delaware Coast Closes Down for Hurricane Sandy  
Media Decoder Blog: News Corporation Is Said to Bid for Penguin  
The Times is providing free, unlimited access to coverage of Hurricane #Sandy on  and our mobile apps. 
No More Kid Stuff for Taylor Swift  
Junk Bonds Are Growing More Popular, and Turning Even Riskier  
Greek Editor Arrested After Publishing List of Swiss Bank Accounts  
Rachel Carson’s Lessons, 50 Years After ‘Silent Spring’  
Look up the #Sandy forecast with your zip code on our interactive map & track the storm's current & projected paths:  
Nanny has not yet been charged in fatal stabbings. After self-injury, she's conscious but unable to talk:  
A Controversial ‘Cure’ for Multiple Sclerosis  
Send us your #Sandy photos:  We'll publish a photo gallery of your preparations and storm scenes. 
City Room: M.T.A. Chief Announces Storm Plan for Subways, Buses and Commuter Trains  
East Coast Braces for Severe Storm Surge  
Breaking News: Governor Cuomo Announces Plans to Shut Down Buses, Subways and Trains
 
Protests Against Sinopec Plant in China Reach Third Day  
Arrest Made in BBC Sex-Abuse Scandal  
The New American Job: A Part-Time Life, as Hours Shrink and Shift for American Workers  
Big City: In a Week of No Ordinary Crimes, the Nanny Case Reverberates  
The Brooklyn Flea Partners Eye a Bigger Future  
Casualties of Toronto’s Urban Skies  
Bob White, a Troubleshooter Plotting Romney’s Trajectory  
Republican Incumbents, Ex-Outsiders, Run on Record in Congress  
Pentagon Reopens Program Allowing Immigrants With Special Skills to Enlist  
Influx of Iraqi Shiites to Syria Widens War’s Scope  
Tsunami Warning for Hawaii After Canada Quake  
How ‘Wreck-It Ralph’ Revisits Retro Video Games  
Magnitude 7.7 Quake Strikes Off Western Canada  
Memo From London: European Union Exit? Concerns Grow for Britain  
Game 3: Giants 2, Tigers 0: World Series: Giants Take 3-0 Lead Over Tigers  
Circa Now: Background Checks and Personal Ethics in the Age of Google  
Chinese Premier’s Family Disputes Article on Riches  
A Village Rape Shatters a Family, and India’s Traditional Silence  
News Analysis: Al Qaeda-Inspired Groups, Minus Goal of Striking U.S.  
The Quad | Live Blog: College Football Saturday  
Romney and Obama Change Plans as Sandy Nears  
Bats: Live Coverage of Game 3: Giants 1, Tigers 0  
In Tight Nevada Senate Race, an Ethics Cloud Looms Large  
Look up the #Sandy forecast with your zip code on our interactive map & track the storm's current & projected paths:  
The Long-gone Side of Vegas, Preserved in Neon  
The Lede: Coastal Surge Forecast From Hurricane Sandy Prompts Evacuations  
From 1860 (Lincoln) to 2012 (Obama) & each year in between, tour the history of presidential endorsements:  
Tracking Voters’ Clicks Online to Try to Sway Them  
Tracking Sandy  
In NYC? Follow for continuous local coverage of #Sandy, including updates on transit suspensions, which could begin Sunday. 
For Obama, a Tricky Balance of Campaigning and Storm  
Look up the #Sandy forecast with your zip code on our interactive map & track the storm's current & projected paths:  
The Lede Blog: Massive Power Failures Expected Across Northeast  
Indonesia Arrests 11 It Says Plotted Attack on U.S. Embassy  
San Francisco’s Beat Museum Welcomes Squares, Too  
In Syria, Cease-Fire for Holiday Falls Apart  
U.S. to Sponsor Health Insurance Plans Nationwide  
Browse presidential candidate endorsements and see which newspapers changed to Romney '12 from Obama '08:  
Traveling soon? Airlines bracing for #Sandy encourage passengers to change plans; cancellation fees waived:  
What will happen on Nov. 6? Use our interactive electoral map to see how your predictions would affect the outcome:  
Motive for stabbings is a mystery as a portrait of a troubled nanny emerges in New York:  
In Final Days of Presidential Election, Fighting County by County  
Our list of 498 New York Times journalists on Twitter:  #FF 
Photo: From the archives of the August 6, 1951, aquatic acrobats in Queens, NY  
Hurricane Sandy on Collision Course With Winter Storm  
Yes, Driverless Cars Know the Way to San Jose  
Hurricane Sandy Approaches Eastern United States  
Critic’s Notebook: For Titus Andronicus, Self-Loathing Is ‘Local Business’  
Van Gogh and His Paris Years at the Denver Art Museum  
Asians’ Success in High School Admissions Tests Seen as Issue by Some  
Approaching Megastorm Threatens East Coast  
Romney Seeks Virginia Coal Country Edge  
Here’s a Memo From the Boss: Vote This Way  
My Multiday Massage-a-Thon  
Rise in Household Debt Might Be Sign of a Strengthening Recovery  
Winter’s Approach Adds to Crisis as Refugee Population Swells  
With Paris Saint-Germain, Qatar Is a Player in French Sports  
Crime Scene: Two Views of Ride for Two in Stolen S.U.V.  
The Saturday Profile: Culinary Battles of Mitterrand’s Chef Go From Kitchen to Screen  
Amherst Account of Rape Brings Tension to Forefront  
Billboard’s Chart Changes Draw Fire  
Energy Drink Disclosures Expose Gaps in Safety Policy  
Motive for Stabbings a Mystery as a Portrait of a Troubled Nanny Emerges  
Arturo Toscanini Possessions to Be Sold at Sotheby’s  
India’s Plague, Trash, Drowns Bangalore, Its Garden City  
sry gotta bail mayb nxt tme  (Hope this doesn't happen to you tonight) 
Marina Krim's online diary of intimate moments becomes a memorial for her children  
How "Hava Nagila" made its way onto a global playlist  
Which newspapers have changed their endorsements to Romney from Obama? Track them here:  
Video: How much is too much when it comes to following the elections? Watch The Sweet Spot and tell us in comments  
The United States may have to go a year or more without satellites that track hurricanes like #Sandy  
Video: A homemade candy recipe that's not for kids, via  
Let Your Smartphone Deliver the Bad News  
Charts: Keep up with polling averages in swing states and which ones Obama & Romney are visiting  
Wealth Matters: Armstrong’s Fortune Likely to Withstand Doping Charges  
City Kitchen: In Praise of Persimmons in Fall  
About New York: Tale of Rory Staunton’s Death Prompts New Medical Efforts Nationwide  
Capital Ideas: Who Gets Credit for the Recovery?  
Capital Ideas: Who Gets Credit for the Recovery?  
U.S.D.A. cuts its estimate of typical American's sugar intake by about 20 pounds  
Senator Harry Reid walked on his own into a hospital after a minor car accident in Las Vegas  
sry gotta bail mayb nxt tme  (Is this tweet rude?) 
Photos of the day: Regional effects of the conflict in Syria, celebrations of Id al-Adha around the world and more  
Dozens Dead in Myanmar as Sectarian Violence Erupts Again  
F.D.A. Finds Unsanitary Conditions at New England Compounding Center  
From The Nets and Brooklyn deserve each other  
Marina Krim's diary of intimate moments becomes a public memorial  
Berlusconi sentenced to 4 years in prison by Italian court, but he's unlikely to serve any time  
Latest on Upper West Side killings: Friends of nanny say she had an up-and-down year  
DealBook: Man Claiming Facebook Ownership Arrested on Fraud Charges  
N.Y.C. transit shutdown is possible as Hurricane Sandy approaches  
‘Back to Blood,’ by Tom Wolfe  
FiveThirtyEight: The State of the States  
ArtsBeat: The Sweet Spot: Election Overload  
Tagg Romney Follows in His Father’s Footsteps, But Probably Not Into Politics  
Ask NYT reporter about the wealth of Chinese officials:  
DealBook: Citigroup Pays Fine and Fires Analysts Over Facebook I.P.O.  
Dying Satellites Could Lead to Shaky Weather Forecasts  
Third-Base Line Plays Weird Role in World Series  
Tracking newspaper endorsements for president, with excerpts and links:  
China blocks access to NYT Web sites following article on wealth of prime minister's family  
《纽约时报》网站在中国大陆遭屏蔽  
Berlusconi Convicted and Sentenced in Tax Fraud  
2 Children Slain at Home in City; Nanny Arrested  
Berlusconi Gets 4-Year Sentence for Tax Evasion  
On Baseball: Tigers’ Doug Fister Struck in Head by Line Drive, Prompting Concerns  
East Coast Keeps a Watchful Eye on Hurricane Sandy  
U.S. Economy Grew at 2% Rate in 3rd Quarter  
European Union Awards Rights Prize to Jailed Iranians  
Breaking News: U.S. Economy Grew at 2% Annual Rate in Third Quarter
 
Syrian Military Declares Truce, but Will Rebuff Attacks  
Phoenix Buyers of a Wright Home Reconsider  
Museum Review: Theodore Roosevelt Memorial at Museum of Natural History  
Jimmy Savile Denied Sex Abuse in 2006 Interview  
Bad Luck and Missteps Make G.O.P.’s Senate Climb Steeper  
Afghan Suicide Bomber Kills Dozens of Worshipers  
Transcript of ’44 Bretton Woods Meeting Found at Treasury  
Death Toll Tops 100 in Myanmar Ethnic Violence, Official Says  
New York Parents Rattled by Fatal Stabbing of 2 Children on Upper West Side  
Suicide Bomber Kills 35 in Afghanistan, Officials Say  
Dietitians Press N.C.A.A. to Allow More Meals for Athletes  
Woman Found Dead and Infant Hurt at Scene of Bronx Fire  
Game 2: Giants 2, Tigers 0: Giants Escape With Victory Over Tigers and Take 2-0 Series Lead  
Political Memo: For Obama Aides, Endgame Takes Grunt Work and Math  
China blocks access to New York Times Web sites following Wen Jiabao article  
Citi Chairman Is Said to Have Planned Pandit’s Exit for Months  
Jacques Barzun, Historian and Scholar, Dies at 104  
Graphic: The Wen family empire in China  
《纽约时报》深入揭示中国总理温家宝的家人如何在其任期内积累起巨额财富： 
Details on the extraordinary wealth amassed by the family of China's prime minister, Wen Jiabao, during his leadership  
Presidential Efforts on Track to Raise $2 Billion  
Busy Day on Campaign Trail for Obama and Romney  
Iran Said to Complete Underground Nuclear Enrichment Plant  
Both Obama and Romney avoid climate change on the campaign trail  
Gilberto Valle, a New York City police officer, was accused of plotting to kidnap women and eat them  
Books of The Times: ‘The Richard Burton Diaries,’ Edited by Chris Williams  
Fine Arts Special Section Preview: Two Exhibitions Re-examine the 1913 Armory Show  
Why many women can't perform a pull-up  
Bats: Updates: World Series Game 2, Tigers vs. Giants  
Early Worries That Hurricane Sandy May Be a ‘Perfect Storm’  
Elevated levels of radioactive cesium in fish near Fukushima, Japan  
Savile Sexual Abuse Case Expands to Other Suspects  
Recipes from Ikaria, the island where people forget to die  
Fatal Stabbings on Upper West Side; Nanny Is Arrested  
In diaries, Richard Burton and Elizabeth Taylor appeared to speak a private language  
Breaking News: Nanny Fatally Stabs Two Children on Upper West Side, Police Say
 
Are you considering early action or early decision for college? Submit questions to the dean of here:  
Hungry City: Cómodo in SoHo  
Amazon Reports Its First Quarterly Loss in Four Years  
Graphic: The Wen family empire in China  
Family of Wen Jiabao Holds a Hidden Fortune in China  
Why are haunted houses so scary?  
The Caucus: Echoing 2008 Obama Slogan, Romney Calls for Change  
Charts: Who's leading in 9 key swing states? Track poll averages and candidate visits here:  
Fish Off Fukushima, Japan, Show Elevated Levels of Cesium  
Ford to Close Plants in Britain and Belgium to Stem Losses  
Stern Will Step Down as N.B.A. Commissioner in 2014  
Business Leaders Urge Deficit Deal Even With More Taxes  
Breaking News: David Stern Will Reportedly Step Down as N.B.A. Commissioner in 2014
 
The Agenda: Climate Change Nearly Absent in the Campaign  
Media Decoder Blog: Pearson and Bertelsmann in Talks to Combine Random House and Penguin  
Critic’s Notebook: Andras Schiff’s Bach Tour Comes to 92nd Street Y  
Quiz: How well do you know your horror movie haunted houses? Test your knowledge here:  
Read the criminal complaint accusing a NYPD officer of plotting to kidnap and cook women  
Syrian Military Declares Four-Day Holiday Truce  
Lens Blog: For Pieter ten Hoopen, Following Footsteps Into Japan's 'Suicide Forest'  
In Midwest, Labor Presses for a Vote to Lock In Union Rights  
Gilberto Valle Accused in Plot to Kidnap Women and Cook Them  
Rosa Parks of currency or domestic terrorist? Creator of the "Liberty Dollar" awaits his fate  
Why many women can't do pull-ups  
Taylor Swift has had to find different ways to grow up  
.@janinedigi, reporter for NYT, is taking your questions about Syria & her reporting on its civil war  
Latest forecast: Romney's momentum seems to have stopped  
Bits Blog: Live Updates From Microsoft's Windows 8 and Surface Event  
FiveThirtyEight: Polls Suggest Romney’s Momentum Has Stalled  
For single women, advice that finding love is a numbers game  
The Caucus: Dilemma for Romney in Candidate’s Rape Remarks  
Zito and Sandoval Let the Giants’ Good Times Roll  
Media Decoder Blog: Times Company Posts a Profit but Revenue Slips  
On Baseball: With Three Mighty Swings, Sandoval Announces His Presence  
Movie Review: ‘Cloud Atlas,’ From Lana and Andy Wachowski and Tom Tykwer  
Tokyo’s Governor Quits to Form New National Party  
Britain Pulls Out of Recession in Third Quarter  
The Caucus: Obama Weighs In on Mourdock Rape Comments  
In Surrogacy Case, Infertile Wife Loses Appeal to Be Named Legal Mother  
Reid’s Machine Aims to Push Obama to Victory in Nevada  
Female Swing Voters, a Coveted Demographic  
Syrian Soldiers Fight Rebels and Fatigue in Homs  
Lens Blog: Adam Ferguson's Travels in Iraq  
A Paean to the Haunted House  
Tokyo Governor Quits to Form Political Party  
Greek Unemployed Cut Off From Medical Treatment  
‘Liberty Dollar’ Creator Awaits His Fate Behind Bars  
Game 1: Giants 8, Tigers 3: Giants Beat Tigers, 8-3, as Pablo Sandoval Homers 3 Times  
Shot After Interrupting Robbery, Officer Kills Suspect  
Is laughter a kind of exercise?  
Single women: Maybe finding love is a numbers game  
British Lawmakers Question Ex-BBC Chief’s Role  
No more kid stuff for Taylor Swift  
Standard of living is in the shadows as election issue:  
U.S. E-Mails Reveal Early Views of Libya Attack  
Romney Campaign Fights for Electoral Votes  
Insults and Accusations Fly in Florida’s House Races  
The Island Where People Forget to Die  #longreads 
Sports of The Times: Islanders, in Name Only, Head to Brooklyn  
Windows, Revamped and Split in 2  
State of the Art: Windows, Revamped a nd Split in 2  
How Bill Clinton may have hurt the Obama campaign  
Artsicle Rents Inexpensive Art Cheaply  
Video: The iPad Mini unveiling, and a 60-second review of Microsoft Surface.  
The Agenda : Rethinking Open Checkbook for Security Colossus  
Bats: World Series Game 1: Giants vs. Tigers  
Time-traveling, 64-year-old has some advice for her 34-year-old self:  
Cheaper Oil and Gas Give a Lift to the Refining Business  
Ohio congressman cancels $850,000 of TV ads because he thinks voters have tuned out:  
Laws Tell Mammogram Clinics to Address Breast Density  
Tax Policy Center in Spotlight for Its White Paper  
Interactive: Under a Picasso painting, a hidden one beneath  
‘Millennium Bomber’ Sentenced to 37 Years in Prison  
DealBook: Ex-Goldman Director Gets 2 Years in Insider Case  
Illinois Debt Takes Toll on Services, Study Finds  
Hunter Pence, Giants’ Free Spirit, Spreads Pixie Dust  
Sudanese Military Factory Bombed in Khartoum  
Well: Recent Spinal Shots May Pose Greatest Meningitis Risk  
The Caucus: How Bill Clinton May Have Hurt the Obama Campaign  
Fed Affirms Low Rates and Sees ‘Moderate’ Growth  
Breaking News: Fed Affirms Low Rates Through Mid-2015; Says Economic Growth Remains ‘Moderate’
 
Bits Blog: Facebook Posts Largest Single-Day Gain After Third-Quarter Earnings Call  
Swing State Tracker: Keep up on polls and candidate visits in nine crucial states  
Strident Anti-Obama Messages Flood Key States  
IHT Op-Ed by Hillary Clinton and Catherine Ashton: Ukraine needs free and fair elections  
The Caucus: Obama Camp Seizes on Republican’s Rape Remarks  
DealBook: Federal Prosecutors Sue Bank of America Over Mortgage Program  
Breaking News: U.S. Sues Bank of America, Saying Countrywide Defrauded Fannie and Freddie
 
At War Blog: A Fearful Rift Between Afghans and Americans  
Thank you! 
Sudan Accuses Israel of Airstrike on Arms Factory  
Thank you! 
Thanks! 
Islanders to Move to Brooklyn From Long Island  
Islanders to Move to Brooklyn From Long Island  
Under a Picasso Painting, Another Picasso Painting  
Breaking News: Islanders Hockey Team to Move to Brooklyn in 2015, Officials Say
 
New Home Sales Jump to Near 2-1/2 Year High in September  
Music Review: An Inspired and Personal ‘Tempest’ Makes Met Debut  
Envoy Announces Tentative Cease-Fire in Syria, but Doubts Remain  
DealBook: Rajaratnam's Lawyers to Appeal His Insider Trading Sentence  
The Island Where People Forget to Die  
European Antitrust Officials Charge Microsoft With Violation  
Gaza Militants Fire Rockets and Mortars Into Southern Israel  
About New York: The Brooklyn Brewery, a Williamsburg Staple, Prepares for an Expansion  
Aqueduct Casino’s Success May Spur Industry Expansion in New York  
Syria Agrees to Cease-Fire During Eid Holiday, Envoy Says  
C.F.P.B. Will Begin Oversight of Debt Collectors  
Barnes & Noble Stores Have Credit Card Data Breach  
One Killed as Gaza Rockets Draw Israeli Strikes  
Race for President Leaves Income Slump in Shadows  
Data Hints at China Manufacturing Rebound  
BBC Defends Its Independence Amid Furor Over Abuse  
A Town’s Passion, a Retired Doctor’s Concern  
Amid Glares, Female Muslim Weightlifters Compete  
U.S. Energy Policy Caught in the Vise of Economics and Politics  
Mark Thompson Says He Did Not Block BBC Savile Program  
The Whiff of Conflict Grows in a Divided Mali  
Seattle Journal: Battling for Customers, Selling Urban Livability in Every Cup  
There's a new crime wave in Rome: Dining Alfresco  
Tigers vs. Giants Was a Century in the Making  
Obama Is Prominent in ‘SEAL Team Six,’ Weinstein Film  
Sterility Found Lacking at Drug Site in Meningitis Outbreak  
2 Boys Charged in Killing of Autumn Pasquale  
‘Castle’ Law at Issue After Fatal Montana Shooting  
Cyberattack on Saudi Oil Firm Disquiets U.S.  
Video: Does "horses and bayonets" sound even better when you auto-tune it?  
Climate change has surfaced in presidential debates in every election since 1988. But not in 2012:  
State of the Art: Microsoft Unveils the Surface, Its First Tablet - Review  
Apple's new iPad Mini: 7.9-inch screen, 2/3 of a pound and $330  
Attack ads prompt some Congressional incumbents to consider changes to campaign-finance laws  
More Than a Case of Jitters as a Shadow Falls on Energy Drinks  
To Lower Pollution, Iran Becomes a Natural Gas Leader  
Video: What's for dinner tonight? How about dumplings to die for from RedFarm or Talde?  
New York Court of Appeals Rejects Challenge to Same-Sex Marriage Law  
Photos: President Obama and Mitt Romney campaign in Florida, a swimming jaguar in Indonesia and more  
About those horses and bayonets...  
Video: Does "horses and bayonets" sound even better when you auto-tune it?  
Facebook Revenue Surpasses Forecasts  
Dumplings Are a Good Thing in a Small Package  
Aleppo Bakery Massacre Further Dims Prospects for Syria Holiday Truce  
For the first time since 1988, climate change did not surface in any of the presidential debates  
How the secret evacuation of Guantánamo in 1962 helped diffuse the Cuban missile crisis  
Apple, Facing Competition, Introduces a Smaller iPad  
Officer and Second Person Fatally Shot on Queens-Nassau Border  
Former C.I.A. Officer Pleads Guilty in Leak Case  
Officer and Second Person Fatally Shot on Queens-Nassau Border  
Apple to sell the iPad Mini for $329, more than Google and Amazon's 7-inch tablets  
Rome Journal: Snacking at the Roman Colosseum? Prepare to Pay a Fine  
Photo: Apple introduces the iPad Mini  
Photo: Apple's new slimmed-down iMac desktop computer  
World Watches and Reacts to U.S. Presidential Race  
Apple introduces new 13-inch MacBook Pro  
‘Rosemarie Trockel: A Cosmos,’ to Open at the New Museum  
Bits: Live Updates From Apple's Product Event  
Live video now: The all-important female vote, the latest on the Senate race and more on TimesCast Politics  
Former C.I.A. Agent Pleads Guilty in Leak Case  
Officer and Suspect Fatally Shot on Queens-Nassau Border  
Videos: Attack ads from 4 congressional races around the United States  
Ralph's bodega was a Brooklyn standby where neighbors bought chips, candy, cigarettes, beer...and allegedly drugs  
Incumbents Hit Hard by Attack Ads Considering Tightening Campaign-Finance Laws  
All of our NYT fact-checks with video and a transcript of the final Obama/Romney debate:  
John Paulson Donates $100 Million to Central Park  
Missed the debate? Still mulling it? & describe the candidates' "bristling exchange"  
Stocks Fall Sharply in Early Trading  
A Tight Focus on Battleground States as Campaigning Time Dwindles  
Video: Obama-Romney debate portrays China as an economic villain and more on Business Day Live  
FiveThirtyEight: Ohio Has 50-50 Chance of Deciding Election  
All of our New York Times fact-checks from the third and final Obama/Romney debate:  
Iran Says It May Stop Oil Sales if Sanctions Tighten  
Body of Missing New Jersey Girl Believed to Be Found  
Out There: Discovery Rekindles Wish for a Journey to the Stars  
Watch the complete video and browse the transcript of the final debate between Obama and Romney:  
Qatari Ruler Makes History With Visit to Gaza Strip  
Drug Arrests at a Brooklyn Bodega Rattle a Neighborhood  
In Mobile World, Tech Giants Scramble to Get Up to Speed  
Presidential Election Weighs on the Federal Reserve  
Pee Wee Football Game With Concussions Brings Penalties for Adults  
DealBook: In London, Nimble Start-Ups Offer Alternatives to Stodgy Banks  
In Report, Speed Trades’ Problems and Pluses  
$2.50 Base Fare for Subways Is Likely, Transit Chairman Suggests  
Parliament to Question BBC Chief in Abuse Scandal  
Russians Seek Fate of Soldiers Still Missing From Afghan War  
City Kitchen: Reconsidering Quiche  
Across Corn Belt, Farmland Prices Keep Soaring  
Check Point: Looking Closely at the Candidates’ Statements on Foreign Policy  
The Tv Watch: Role Reversal Gives President Harder Line, and Punch Lines  
News Analysis: Romney Seeks Out Center, Avoiding Hawkish Tone  
Giants 9, Cardinals 0: Giants Beat Cardinals to Advance to the World Series  
Video clip: Obama conjures horses and bayonets  
Sports Alert: Giants Beat the Cardinals, Advancing to the World Series
 
Photos: The 2012 presidential campaign, week by week  
In Game 7, Giants and Cardinals return to familiar territory  
Complete video and transcript of the final debate between Barack Obama and Mitt Romney:  
Watch live now: NYT reporters and editors in New York and Florida give their analysis of tonight's debate  
All of NYT's fact-checks from the third debate in one place:  
Obama: "Governor, you keep on trying to airbrush history." 
Fact-check: Romney said tonight that Iran was "four years closer to a nuclear weapon." How close is that?  
Poll chart: Attitudes toward the U.S. became more favorable after Obama was elected but have declined since  
What Obama or Romney statements tonight should be fact-checked? Tweet us w/ #AskNYT. We're answering here:  
Fact-check: Romney said Obama was "silent" on Iran uprisings. There's some truth to that, but it's not the whole story  
What did Obama and Romney just say? Follow our running transcript of the debate:  
The early word on the tone of tonight's debate, from NYT's aggressive  
Campaign Moods Shift as Contest Tightens  
Romney on the Arab Spring: "We can't kill our way out of this mess." 
Watch live now: A complete video stream of tonight's Obama/Romney debate, plus NYT analysis afterward  
When you hear Obama or Romney say something tonight deserving a second look, tweet our live fact-check desk w/#AskNYT. We're standing by. 
Follow for rapid NYT fact-checks, video clips, photos, charts and analysis from tonight's Obama-Romney debate. 
Live video now: NYT reporters and editors preview tonight's final debate  
Keep up with the Obama-Romney #debates anywhere with the NYT's Election 2012 App for iPhone and Android  
On Location: In Warsaw, a Creative Home Fills a Void  
Interactive map: Which candidate will win the election? Make your own scenario to reach 270 electoral votes  
For voters, leadership may be the most important issue in Obama-Romney debate on foreign policy  
A field guide for tonight's presidential debate on foreign policy, by  
City Room: Charges Against Ehud Halevy Are Dropped After Video Appears  
Italy Convicts 7 for Failure to Warn of Quake  
Before Meningitis Outbreak, Group Advised How to Avoid F.D.A.  
How does U.S. foreign policy impact you personally? Tweet us. We'll read responses in our pre-debate live video show. 
Get ready for tonight's Obama-Romney debate with a NYT reading list on the issues  
Interactive: 12 blue things, both natural and artificial  
Settlement Eases Rules for Some Medicare Patients  
Video: A Twitter ban in Germany, previewing Windows 8 and more on TimesCast Media + Tech  
The Caucus: Debates Put Focus on Romney's 'Day 1' Pledges  
Basics: True Blue Stands Out in an Earthy Crowd  
Bits Blog: Amazon Cloud Service Goes Down and Takes Some Popular Web Sites With It  
Showtime orders a 3rd season of "Homeland"  
Follow for fact-checks, videos and analysis by NYT editors and reporters of the final Obama-Romney debate 
The Caucus: Foreign Policy Debate Puts Focus on Leadership  
China’s Slowing Economy Puts Pressure on American Exporters  
De Gustibus: Making a Meal Out of Peanut Butter and Pickles  
Books of The Times: In ‘The Oath,’ Jeffrey Toobin Portrays Supreme Court  
F.D.A. Receives Death Reports Citing Monster Energy, a High-Caffeine Drink  
Jordanian Soldier Killed in Syrian Border Clash  
Listen: The #CMJ Music Marathon has ended, and here are the NYT's final playlists  
Political Memo: Unseen, but Looming Over the Race: George W. Bush  
Photos offered to show Fidel Castro is alive: "I don't even remember what a headache feels like."  
Lebanese Army Warns Against Score-Settling  
Map: Will President Obama or Mitt Romney win the election? Show us how they get to 270 electoral votes  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 21: Uncertainty Clouds Polling, but Obama Remains Electoral College Favorite  
Responses to Benghazi attack and Arab Spring highlight contrasts between Obama and Romney  
After Benghazi attack, Obama administration's statements lagged behind intelligence  
Russell Means, American Indian Activist, Dies at 72  
The Appraisal: Saying Goodbye to the Face of New York’s Brownstones  
BBC editor steps aside after program abandoned investigation of Jimmy Savile abuse scandal  
Chickens threaten to divide Brooklyn community  
Russell Means, Indian Activist, Actor, Dies at 72  
New York rule forbidding masks at protests faces court challenge  
In tight Indiana race, Senate candidates move to the center  
The Caucus: Ohio Race Tightens in New Poll  
Jimmy Savile Scandal  
DealBook: BP Reaches Deal to Sell Russian Assets to Rosneft  
Lance Armstrong Stripped of His 7 Tour de France Titles  
NBC Finds Itself in Unfamiliar Territory: On Top  
Antigua Journal: In Guatemalan Tourist Haven, Corruption Case Prompts Soul-Searching  
Breaking News: Lance Armstrong Stripped of His Seven Tour de France Titles for Doping 
 
On Baseball: Ryan Vogelsong of Giants Gets Second Win of N.L.C.S.  
Knoedler Made Huge Profits on Fake Rothko, Lawsuit Claims  
Attack in Libya Shows Contrasting Views of Obama and Romney  
Explanation for Benghazi Attack Under Scrutiny  
French Music Streaming Service Takes on the World, Sans America  
Castro Photos Appear to Debunk Rumors of His Death  
Pablo Prigioni of Knicks Is N.B.A.’s Oldest Rookie in 40 Years  
Libyan Town Under Siege Is a Center of Resistance  
BP Board Approves Rosneft Deal  
Music Review: The Ukulele Orchestra of Great Britain at Carnegie Hall  
Giants 6, Cardinals 1: Giants Beat Cardinals and Force Game 7 in N.L.C.S.  
In Texas, a Legal Battle Over Biblical Banners  
Changing of the Guard: Many Urge China’s Next Leader to Press Reform  
Meningitis Exposure Patients Wait and Worry  
Critic’s Notebook: Cacophonous Declarations of Independents  
Patriots 29, Jets 26: Patriots Hold Off Jets in Overtime  
Patriots 29, Jets 26: Field Goal Lifts Patriots Over Jets in Overtime  
Candidates Skirt Talk of Hard Afghanistan Choices  
FiveThirtyEight: 'Gender Gap' Near Historic Highs  
Disney, Struggling to Assert an Online Presence, Overhauls   
Giants 27, Redskins 23: Giants Beat Redskins on Late Touchdown Pass  
Three Killed in Shooting at Spa in Brookfield, Wis.  
Windows, Staple of Most PCs, Gets a Major Makeover  
Pathways in Technology Early College High School Takes a New Approach to Vocational Education  
E. Donnall Thomas, Furthered Bone Marrow Transplants, Dies  
Big City: Oh, the Horror, the Horror of Upper East Side Halloween Décor  
Tim Tebow Fans Bemoan His Limited Playing Time With Jets  
Rescued Kurt Weill Recording Is Sweet Vindication for Accidental Discoverer  
The Caucus: Monday's Debate Puts Focus on Foreign Policy Clashes  
Police Fire Tear Gas at Opposition Protesters in Kuwait  
Modern Love: A Soldier Leaves a Girl Behind - Modern Love  
A collection of New York Times Op-Eds written by George McGovern  
Evolving Technology Helps Giants Respond to Injury  
Pope Canonizes Kateri Tekewitha and Marianne Cope  
Thousands Gather in Beirut for General’s Funeral  
Cash Flood Allows Fight to the Finish for Electoral Votes  
For President Obama, a Complex Calculus of Race and Politics  
1922-2012: George McGovern, a Democratic Presidential Nominee and Liberal Stalwart, Dies at 90  
Breaking News: Former Senator George McGovern, Who Lost 1972 Presidential Bid, Dies at 90
 
Breaking News: Former Senator George McGovern, Who Lost 1972 Presidential Bid, Dies at 90
 
The Energy Rush: In a Natural Gas Glut, Big Winners and Losers  
Romney Plan for More Military Ships Is Called Unrealistic  
Ethical Questions Raised by In Vitro Raffle  
Explosion Rocks Damascus Neighorhood  
How Lance Armstrong’s Wall Fell, One Rider at a Time  
Eat: A Fish Called Dinner  
Economic View: How the Fiscal Stimulus Helped, and Could Have Done More  
Twitter Gives Saudi Arabia a Revolution of Its Own  
Afghan Insider Attacks on West’s Forces Corrode Trust  
Championship Boxing Is Back in Brooklyn  
Guatemala Shooting Raises Concerns About Military’s Expanded Role  
China Looks On Warily Amid U.S. Candidates’ Tough Talk  
Reported Golden Dawn Sightings Rattle Astoria, Queens  
Romney’s Throwback Language, His Mittisms  
Jeffrey Deitch Faces Critics at MOCA  
Novelties: New Webcams Add Wide-Angle Video Calls to Your TV  
Skateboarders Defy Court To Race Down Broadway  
Filmmakers Who Are Ultra Orthodox and Ultra Committed  
Pregnant Brooklyn Woman Fatally Stabbed a Day Before Her Wedding  
Pregnant N.Y. Woman Found Slain Day Before Wedding  
Baghdad Market Blasts Kill 11  
Amid the Echoes of an Economic Crash, the Sounds of Greek Society Being Torn  
The Quad | Live Blog: College Football Saturday  
Bits: A Reddit Forum Prompts Questions of Where to Draw a Line  
Iran Said Ready to Talk to U.S. About Nuclear Program  
Romney’s Stance on Obama Reprieves Panics Young Immigrants  
The Caucus: Cash Advantage for Romney as Campaign Enters Final Weeks  
The Caucus: Ryan Campaigns in Coal Country  
The Caucus: Biden Calls Romney's Proposals 'Etch A Sketchy'  
Away From Broadway’s Glare, Walsh Embarks on Act II  
Trying to Save the Old in Phoenix, a City That Values the New  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 19: After Romney Gains, Should Obama Concede Florida?  
Church Appeal on Israel Angers Jewish Groups  
Spain’s Premier Hopes to Avoid Electoral Setback on Austerity  
Afghan Police Officers Attack Colleagues  
Lebanese Premier Offers to Resign After Deadly Bombing  
Tough Criticism of Candidates by Bloomberg  
Crime Scene: Exonerated in Silence, Travis Tremell Faces Effects of a Public Arrest  
Scene Stealers: Larry Flynt, Pornography and Politics  
News Analysis: The Foreign Policy Debate  
For Minority Students at Elite New York Private Schools, Admittance Doesn’t Bring Acceptance  
Interactive: Will Obama or Romney win the election? Build your own victory scenario  
Israel Takes Control of Ship Heading to Gaza  
In Wi-Fi-Intoxicated Manhattan, a Generation of Teetotalers  
Large, Poor Families Are Left Out of New York’s Housing Plans, Officials Say  
Chief of Elite Police Unit Involved in Shootings Is Reassigned  
The Long Run: Romney as a Manager: Unhurried and Socratic  
‘Country Bear Jamboree’ at Walt Disney World  
In Silicon Valley, Perks Now Begin at Home  
Jockeying Begins for Cabinet Positions, Weeks Before the Election  
Syrian Government Booby-Traps Rebels’ Ammunition  
6 Afghan Police Officers Are Killed in Insider Attack  
What I Love: What I Love — A Lounge of Her Own  
Your Money: How Senators and Representatives Can Help Constituents  
Giant Steps for Dance in Los Angeles  
Puberty Starting Earlier in Boys, New Study Suggests  
Game 5: Giants 5, Cardinals 0: Barry Zito Pitches Giants Past Cardinals in Game 5 of N.L.C.S.  
Berkeley, Targeting Homeless, Proposes Ban on Sidewalk Sitting  
Interactive: Build your own scenario for an Obama or Romney electoral victory  
News Analysis: Pakistan Rage at Girl Shooting Gives Way to Skepticism  
Microsoft Expands Gathering and Use of Data From Web Products  
Cute: An orphaned baby walrus. Cuter: When kids draw him  
Video: It's the 25th anniversary of Black Monday on Wall Street  
Defenses of gay marriage have made Chris Kluwe more than just a punter  via 
Weekend reading: All 5 parts of Donna's Diner, series from Elyria, Ohio  #longreads 
A biker, a blonde and piles of C.I.A. cash in a ruse to find Anwar al-Awlaki  
Fire Fells a Really Big Cowboy in Dallas  
News Analysis: The opiate of American exceptionalism  
The Pour: 20 Autumn Wines for $20  
In Study, Weight Loss Did Not Prevent Heart Attacks in Diabetics  
Videos: Donna's Diner, a profile of Elyria, Ohio, a swing state town  #watchitlater 
Economix Blog: Immigration and American Jobs  
Anita Dunn, Both Insider and Outsider in Obama Camp  
3 top Democratic "super PACs" report their best fundraising month of this election  via 
Shares Tumble on Weak Company Reports  
Sports of The Times: Yankees’ Old Ways Catch Up With Them  
Photos of the day: a bombing in Beirut, championship flyboarding in Qatar and more  
South Africa President Jacob Zuma Unveils $100 Billion Jobs Program  
Rebounding From 9/11, Lower Manhattan Sees Population Growth  
Punter Chris Kluwe’s Voice Is Heard in Same-Sex Marriage Debate  
Airtime, a Pedigreed Start-Up, Is Tested  
Dane’s Wild Tale of Ruse to Find Anwar al-Awlaki  
Video: and get ready for this year's awards season on The Sweet Spot  
A Good Appetite: An Autumnal Meal of Chicken Thighs and Delicata Squash  
News Analysis: Candidates and the Truth About America  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 18: Obama Gains in Forecast on Resiliency in Swing State Polls  
ARTS: The Sweet Spot | October 19, 2012  
Curfew Imposed on American Troops in Japan  
The Lede Blog: On Twitter, Videos and Photos of the Aftermath of the Beirut Bombing  
Listen: playlists for the #CMJ Music Marathon from &  
Tom Wolfe tries in 'Back to Blood' to do for Miami what he did for New York in 'Bonfire of the Vanities'  
Cute: An orphaned baby walrus. Cuter: Kids' drawings of him  
Turkey and Egypt Look to Team Up Amid Tumult  
You don't work as hard as you say you do, Labor Department study says  
High & Low Finance: A Computer Lesson From 1987, Still Unlearned by Wall Street  
Video: President Obama's remarks at Thursday's Al Smith charity dinner  
Video: Mitt Romney's remarks at Thursday's Al Smith charity dinner  
Bomb Blast Rocks Beirut, Killing at Least Eight  
So Obama, Romney and a Cardinal walk into a charity dinner...  
Libyan accused of being ringleader of Benghazi attack, in plain sight, scoffs at U.S.  
Two Killed in Central Beirut Explosion  
What Happens in Brooklyn Moves to Vegas  
Pakistani Schoolgirl Shot by Taliban Showing Progress  
Pakistani Girl Who Was Shot Is Improving, Doctors Say  
Democrats Use Obscure Health Law Provision  
In 3 Crucial States, Both Campaigns Press for Latino Voters  
Blast in Afghanistan Kills 15 en Route to Wedding  
On Baseball: Tigers’ Sweep Ends Yankees’ Punchless Postseason  
Books Of the Times: ‘Back to Blood’ by Tom Wolfe  
Missouri Political Donor Thrives With ‘No-Limits’ Giving  
British Police Investigate Twitter Account  
Soldiers and Insurgents Killed in Yemen Battle  
Killings Thwart Grass-Roots Democracy in India  
Mexico City Journal: At Homeless World Cup, Respite From the Killing Fields  
Stanford Ovshinsky, an Inventor Compared to Edison, Dies at 89  
Larry Itliong, Forgotten Filipino Labor Leader  
Obama and Romney Attend Al Smith Charity Dinner  
FiveThirtyEight: Gallup vs. the World  
Art Review: ‘Roy Lichtenstein: A Retrospective,’ at the National Gallery of Art  
Argentine Navy Ship Seizure Forces Shake-Up  
A.L.C.S. Game 4: Tigers 8, Yankees 1: Yankees Are Undone in Playoffs as Tigers Advance to the World Series  
Suspect in Benghazi Attack Scoffs at U.S.  
A man who will juggle for all 26.2 miles of the NYC marathon says "the hard part is the running."  
You had great questions for NYT executive editor Here are her answers  
Boy Scouts files detail accusations of sexual abuse against 1,247 scout leaders between 1965 and 1985  
Afghan Officials Spar Over 2014 Vote  
Sports Alert: Tigers Sweep Yankees, Advancing to World Series
 
Springsteen Helps Obama Lure Blue-Collar Votes in Ohio  
Obama and Romney to Joust and Quip at Al Smith Dinner  
Joggling the Marathon: 3 Beanbags and 26.2 Miles  
Bats: Live Analysis: Game 4 of the A.L.C.S., Yankees vs. Tigers  
Obama Pushes a Get Out the Vote Operation  
The Corner Where Afghanistan, Iran and Pakistan Meet  
A dasheen bush, and many other Caribbean mainstays, grow in East New York, Brooklyn  
Boy Scout Documents Reveal Decades of Sexual Abuse  
Tina Brown tells "We have been able to bring Newsweek back to relevance."  
Appeals Court Rules Against Defense of Marriage Act  
Iron-Dumping Experiment in Pacific Alarms Marine Experts  
Google Shares Drop After Earnings Disappoint  
The NYT's & are at the #CMJ Music Marathon. playlists and show reviews here  
Google's 3Q Earnings Leak Early  
Pakistani Police Detain Family of Suspect in Attack on Malala Yousafzai  
Google Jumps Gun on Results, Revenue Soft  
Live video now: Obama and Romney focus on women voters, The Boss on the trail and more on TimesCast Politics  
Obama and Romney to share a stage tonight, potentially with more laughs and less pointing  
The rising costs of going to college may blunt President Obama's education policy efforts  
Google Inc.'s stock chart  
Can make nice?  
Breaking News: Google Shares Plunge After Early Release of Earnings
 
A Second Appeals Court Calls Marriage Law Unfair to Gays  
More Asian Immigrants Are Finding Ballots in Their Native Tongue  
New answers from NYT executive editor #TalktoNYT session  
Kayle Leogrande, the "tattooed guy," was pivotal to Lance Armstrong inquiry  
Syrian Military’s Bombing Attack Kills Dozens  
Which of NYC's 5 boroughs has the most optimistic residents? Answer here:  
Gay Marriage Support Grows Among Latinos, Survey Finds  
At the E.U. Summit, a Focus on Cohesion  
In Damascus, once shielded from Syria's uprising, "the reality of war has crept into daily life," reports  
Twitter Blocks Access to Neo-Nazi Group in Germany  
The NYT's executive editor Jill Abramson is answering more of your questions today. Tweet with #TalktoNYT or ask here:  
Qaeda Branch Leader Said to Be Among Dead in Yemen Drone Strike  
Media Decoder: Newsweek Will Cease Print Publication at End of Year  
Newsweek Ending Print Edition, Job Cuts Expected  
Twitter Shuts Out German Neo-Nazi Group’s Account  
George McGovern No Longer Responsive, Family Says  
Slowdown in China Appears to Have Ended, for Now  
Apple Loses Tablet Copyright Appeal Against Samsung  
Syrian War Reaches Damascus  
Drug Makers Stalled in a Cycle of Quality Lapses and Shortages  
On Baseball: It’s Open Season on Alex Rodriguez  
Greek Workers Hold National Strike to Protest Austerity  
Inquiry Into Kayle Leogrande Led to Armstrong’s Eventual Fall  
College Costs Test Obama’s Education Policies  
China Reports Slower Growth but Sees Signs of a Revival  
Jimmy Savile Scandal Turns the Tables on BBC Program  
Uruguay Senate Approves First-Trimester Abortions  
Gillibrand and Long Clash in Debate for U.S. Senate  
2012 A.L.C.S. — Threat of Rain Pushes Back Sabathia and Game 4  
A daily multivitamin may reduce cancer risk:  
This Land | Donna's Diner: This Land: With a New Menu and a Makeover, a Pledge to Keep Going  
From Nate Silver at Can polls exaggerate bounces?  
From Nate Silver at Can polls exaggerate bounces?  
What happens after a high-profile art burglary?  
Mormons and Scouts Act as Partners in Molding Boys  
Campaigns Raise Focus on Women for Final Weeks  
The perils of sitting:  
New Scrutiny of Company That Made Tainted Drug  
Bats: Live Analysis: Game 4 of the A.L.C.S., Yankees vs. Tigers  
University of Phoenix to Close 115 Locations  
With Google AdWords costs rising, small companies seek alternatives:  
To Fight Prescription Painkiller Abuse, D.E.A. Targets Distributors  
News Analysis: Debates Have Not Clarified Matters for Voters — News Analysis  
NYC Mayor Michael Bloomberg forms super PAC, expects to spend $10-15 million  
Colombians Restart Talks in Hopes of Ending War  
Video: A closer look at the Golden Globes pairing of Amy Poehler and Tina Fey  
Ambassador Gary Locke Met With Tibetans Last Month  
A statue honoring troops who led the way into Afghanistan has arrived at Ground Zero:  
Thousands Mourn Former King Sihanouk in Cambodian Capital  
China’s Renminbi Has Strengthened During Obama’s Term  
Mansour Arbabsiar Pleads Guilty in Plot to Kill Saudi Envoy  
Arrest in Plot to Blow Up Federal Reserve Bank  
New planet with the same mass as Earth's found in Alpha Centauri star system, the Sun's closest neighhor:  
Bloomberg Forming ‘Super PAC’ to Influence 2012 Races  
Breaking News: Bloomberg Jumps Into ’12 Races With New ‘Super PAC’
 
Russia Arrests Opposition Activist, Citing Terrorism Threat  
Iran Media Officials Castigate Europe Over Satellite Blackout  
Critic's Notebook: A Vision to Avoid Demolition for ’70s Pioneer  
Television Review: ‘Ethel,’ a Documentary by Rory Kennedy, on HBO  
Questions and Answers on the Benghazi Attack  
Florida Judge Sets Trial Date in Trayvon Martin Case  
Following the #CMJ festival? Listen to a 9-song playlist by NYT's from last night's shows:  
For RZA, Hip-Hop Was Just a Prelude to Kung Fu  
Obama Team Believes He Reset the Race  
Video: Hip-hop meets hipster in Bed-Stuy style  
.@JillAbramson, NYT executive editor, is answering your questions this week. Submit here:  or tweet Qs w/ #TalktoNYT 
Daily Multivitamin May Reduce Cancer Risk, Clinical Trial Finds  
U.S. Housing Starts Up 15% in September  
Restaurant Review: Blanca in Bushwick, Brooklyn gets ★★ from 
The TV Watch: In debate's dance, Romney has more missteps than Obama  
Interactive debate analysis using video, fact-checks & graphics to examine the candidates' performances:  
Obama and Romney Focus on Efforts to Woo Women  
Lance Armstrong Dropped by Nike, Steps Down as Chairman of His Charity  
Obama's strategy in 2nd debate with Romney: Punch, punch and punch again  
Fact-checks on Libya, energy policy, immigration and other subjects of the 2nd Obama-Romney debate  
Obama and Romney bring bare fists to debate rematch  
Armstrong Steps Down From Livestrong Charity  
DealBook: Investors Hope for Clarity, Quickly  
Strongest words in 2nd Obama-Romney debate are devoted to Libya attack  
Talk to The Times: Jill Abramson, Executive Editor, Answers Questions  
Pilgrimage From Hawaii to New York to Honor Marianne Cope, Soon to Be Sainted  
Maine Town Abuzz Over Prostitution Inquiry and Client List  
3 New York Senate Races Flooded by Money from Outside Groups  
Ben Sprecher, ‘Rebecca’ Producer, Explains His Fallen Dream  
Bell Sounds on a Lifetime in the Boxing Ring  
European Union to Discuss Changes in Euro Zone  
$11 Million Severance Reported for Murdoch Aide Brooks  
In the Hard Fall of a Favorite Son, a Reminder of a City's Scars  
In new ad, Romney stresses moderate positions on reproductive issues:  
Battery Maker A123 Systems Files for Bankruptcy  
Tigers 2, Yankees 1: Behind Verlander, Tigers Take 3-0 Lead Over Yankees  
Check Point: A Closer Look at Some Disputed Claims  
News Analysis: In Second Debate, Obama Strikes Back  
Investigators visit office tied to meningitis cases  
New planet found in Alpha Centauri:  
The TV Watch: In 2nd debate, Romney had more bad moments than Obama  
Romney campaign makes $12 million ad buy:  
Who won the debate? Think twice about the answers on Twitter:  
Obama and Romney turn up the temperature at their second debate  
Full transcript and video of the 2nd Obama-Romney debate  
Photo: Plenty of pointing fingers in the second debate between Obama and Romney (by  
Watch the full video of Round 2 between Barack Obama and Mitt Romney:  
Video clip: Obama and Romney clash over the attack in Libya  
Romney: "I care about 100 percent of the American people. I want 100 percent of the American people to have a bright and prosperous future." 
Obama: "Governor, you're the last person who's going to get tough on China." 
Photo: Mitt Romney and Barack Obama have had some feisty moments early in the debate  
What did Obama and Romney just say? Follow our running transcript of the debate  
Obama on tax rates: "Romney doesn't have a 5-point plan. He has a 1-point plan." 
NYT reporters will answer your questions about what Obama and Romney say in the debate tonight. Tweet them with #AskNYT 
Obama and Romney are on stage. We're streaming the debate live here:  
Follow for rapid NYT fact-checks, video clips, photos, charts and analysis from tonight's Obama-Romney debate 
Live video now: NYT reporters and editors prepare you for the debate  
Bats: Yankees vs. Tigers  
Keep up with the Obama-Romney #debates anywhere with the NYT's Election 2012 App for iPhone and Android  
Feds Raid Lab Linked to National Meningitis Outbreak  
The aftermath of clashes in Ivory Coast, Air Force One's shadow and more pictures of the day  
Tell us: What or who will you rely on tonight to help you decide which candidate won the debate? We'll show responses on live video. 
The Caucus: Town Hall Format Poses Risks for Both Candidates  
Follow and for updates from #CMJ Music Marathon. Here's their first report  
ArtsBeat: Hilary Mantel Wins a Second Booker Prize  
Interactive Chart: How the states have shifted in presidential elections back to Eisenhower-Stevenson  
Follow for rapid NYT fact-checks, video clips, charts and analysis from tonight's Obama-Romney debate 
Picasso and Monets Are Stolen From Dutch Museum  
Income Inequality May Take Toll on Economic Growth  
Appeals Court Overturns Terrorism Conviction of Salim Ahmed Hamdan, Bin Laden’s Driver  
Raising Sought-After Snails in California  
Justices Reject Appeal Over Early Voting in Ohio  
In Full Swing: In a Tight Iowa House Race, White House Run Reverberates  
‘Argo,’ as Seen by the Iran Hostage Crisis Survivors  
Cuba to End Exit Visa Requirement in January  
The Caucus: For Romney, a Chance to Help Close the Gender Gap  
Britain Refuses to Extradite Computer Hacker Sought in U.S.  
The Caucus: Justice Department Seeks to Dismiss Lawsuit Over Operation Fast and Furious  
Six Hopefuls Worth Watching at the CMJ Music Marathon  
Cuba Scraps Exit Visa Requirement  
Picasso and Monets Are Stolen in Dutch Heist  
Video: What if you looked in the mirror & saw the world's most powerful man staring back at you? Meet the Bronx Obama:  
General’s 1962 Memo Addresses Nuclear Combat on Cuba  
Radovan Karadzic, Former Bosnian Leader, Begins His Genocide Defense  
Justice Seeks Dismissal of ‘Fast and Furious’ Suit  
Debate Fever Helps Raise Hofstra's Image  
Political Memo: Budget Crisis Likely to Define Obama or Romney Term  
DealBook: Pandit Steps Down as Citi's Chief  
DealBook: Goldman Sachs Swings to Profit as Revenue Surges  
Breaking News: Vikram Pandit Steps Down as Chief Executive of Citigroup; Michael Corbat Takes Over
 
Paul Ryan Can’t Lose  
New York’s Rising Jobless Rate Poses Test for Cuomo  
Seeking Aid, More Districts Change Teacher Evaluations  
Google Is Asked to Change Privacy Policy to Protect Data  
M.T.A. Chief Signals MetroCard Bonus Won’t Vanish  
Ex-Bosnian Serb Leader Says He Did Not Mastermind Killings  
News Analysis: Stanford Organic Food Study and Vagaries of Meta-Analyses  
Essay: Michael Barry — Cycling Is Cleaner Sport, Not a Safer One  
Memo From the Middle East: Election-Year Stakes Overshadow Nuances of Benghazi Investigation  
Quick, Hide the BlackBerry, It’s Too Uncool  
Well: The Doctor Can See You Now. Really, Right Now.  
Afghan Army’s High Turnover Clouds U.S. Exit Plan  
Former Israeli Leader Olmert Plans Comeback After Conviction  
Brahimi Seeks Syria Cease-Fire for Id  
Fabio Luisi Can’t Cover for James Levine in Next Met Season  
Giants 7, Cardinals 1: Giants Beat the Cardinals in Game 2 of the N.L.C.S.  
China and Its Trade Tactics Are Coming to the Debates  
Clinton Takes Responsibility for Libya Security Failure  
After a breakup, needed to change her life and her bed:  
Nets 98, Wizards 88: Nets Beat Wizards in First Preseason Game at Barclays Center  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 15: Distracted by Polling Noise  
Few Teams Have Come Back From Playoff Hole Yankees Are In  
Photos: A dancer/photographer visually expresses what it feels like to be dancing  
This Land | Donna's Diner: This Land: After a Childhood Pouring Refills, Reaching Beyond the Past  
Hospitals Ditch Formula Samples to Promote Breast-Feeding  
Photos of the Day: Syria and elsewhere  
Economists Call Delaying Aid for Spain Risky for Europe  
Over the Decades, How States Have Shifted  
Why do red wine and steak work so well together? The chemistry behind food pairings:  
Does your dinner party need a social media policy?  
‘Glengarry Glen Ross’ at Fairfield, as a Classroom Text  
Quiz: Google says more users search for trivia on mobile than on computers. Can you answer these without help?  
Economix Blog: Fed Official Says Monetary Steps Were Too Timid  
U.S. to Help Create Libyan Commando Force  
A cyclist calls for a complete restructuring of the profession:  
Shining a Light on Myanmar’s Comfort Food  
Wider Meningitis Risk From Tainted Drugs Feared  
Go beyond strips: 25 ways to cook bacon.  
Tracing Crucial Components of Meningitis Outbreak  
A meteorite's 700,000-year trip from Mars to Morocco:  
The Caucus: Romney Raises $170 Million to Finance Late Push in Race  
Sept. 11 Terrorism Case Resumes Smoothly at Guantánamo  
Explosives Detectors Aim to Go Nose to Nose With Sniffer Dogs  
Though devices improve, bomb-sniffing dogs still have the best nose for the job:  
City Room: Which Transit Fare Increase Seems Fairest?  
Do you have questions about the New York Road Runners and the NYC Marathon? Ask our reporters:  
Video: The debates' influence on broadcasters, a talk with and social media meets spoken word poetry  
Never to Be Outdone, Vegas Sets Record for Political Ads  
Supreme Court to Hear Case on Arizona Voter Registration  
Photo: Admiring a Condor bomber at Wright Field, August 28, 1927  
The Appraisal: Many High-End New York Apartments Have Modest Tax Rates  
European Union Intensifies Sanctions on Iran  
Philippine Government Signs Pact With Muslim Rebels  
Lens Blog: Mikhail Baryshnikov, Dance Photographer  
DealBook: Citigroup Earnings Plummeted in Third Quarter  
Feds Arrest Middle Man Financier for Rebecca Show  
E.U. Agrees to Impose New Iran Sanctions  
Gary Johnson Libertarian Candidate Worries Republicans  
Alvin Roth and Lloyd Shapley Win Nobel in Economic Science  
2 Americans Win Nobel Prize for Economics  
Breaking News: Alvin Roth and Lloyd Shapley of U.S. Win Nobel in Economic Science
 
Critic’s Notebook: Jerry Seinfeld Is Still at Home Doing Stand-Up  
New York Republican Candidates Embrace Cuomo’s Crossover Appeal  
With Profits Dropping, High-Speed Trading Cools Down  
Jihadists Receiving Most Arms Sent to Syrian Rebels  
Malala Yousafzai Is Airlifted to British Hospital  
Well: HPV Vaccine Does Not Alter Sexual Behavior, Study Finds  
The Runner Christian Hesch Describes Doping With EPO  
North Koreans Say Life Has Not Improved  
Xbox Music Leads Microsoft’s New Push to Challenge iTunes  
Music Review: Pat Metheny and His Quartet at Town Hall  
Cornell Unveiling Plans for Roosevelt Island Tech Center  
Cornell Unveiling Plans for Roosevelt Island Tech Center  
A.C.L.U. to Sue Morgan Stanley Over Mortgage Loans  
"We're a small window into the opportunities and struggles of all people across the country."  #Longreads 
Google Aims to Move Ever More Seamlessly Into Daily Life  
Memo From the West Bank: All-Female Ticket, a First in Palestinian Territories, Campaigns in Hebron  
Anna Hallman of Elyria, Ohio: "Well, I'm basically doing what I can each day, trying to keep the house."  
Part 2 of series on Elyria, Ohio, a city w/problems & opportunities common to cities across the U.S.  
A Serious Debate Prep Session for Obama  
Navy Nuclear Sub and Cruiser Collide Off East Coast  
Jeter Is Latest Aging Yankee to Fall  
Norodom Sihanouk, Cambodian Leader Through Shifting Allegiances, Dies at 89  
Tigers 3, Yankees 0: A.L.C.S — Hiroki Kuroda Shines, but Yankees Lose  
Giants 26, 49ers 3: Giants Stifle 49ers, Turning Rematch Into Mismatch  
DealBook: Sprint Gets Closer to Deal With SoftBank  
Theater Review: Tracy Letts in ‘Who’s Afraid of Virginia Woolf?’  
‘Joseph Anton: A Memoir,’ by Salman Rushdie  
Seeing a Homosexual Agenda, Christian Group Protests an Anti-Bullying Program  
Reverse Mortgages Costing Some Seniors Their Homes  
Bats: Live Updates and Analysis: Game 2 of A.L.C.S., Tigers vs. Yankees  
Bengazi Episode Takes on Political Overtones  
Portugal Readies Budget With Job Cuts and Tax Increases  
Redesigning the Polo Lounge  
Part one of special series on Donna's Diner, an Ohio business at the corner of hope and worry  
Our Generation: Returning Favors With Neighborly Advice  
The Caucus: 5 Tips for Each Campaign After Tuesday’s Debate  
In Russia, Protesters Try to Gain Foothold via Elections  
Breaking News: Felix Baumgartner, Professional Daredevil, Lands After Jump of More Than 24 Miles
 
Video Feature: Step inside Donna's Diner, run on a shoestring in a the pivotal election state of Ohio.  
Libyan Government Struggles to Rein In Powerful Militias  
Arlen Specter, Senator, Dies at 82  
Breaking News: Arlen Specter, Former Senator, Dead at 82; Played Role in Supreme Court Nominations
 
Felix Baumgartner Getting Ready to Try a 22-Mile Fall  
Cook’s Illustrated’s Christopher Kimball Believes Cooking Is Ultraserious Business  
Mauritanian President Appeals for Calm After He Is Shot  
On Roosevelt Avenue in Queens, Vice Remains a Stubborn Presence  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 13: Arizona and the Spanish-Speaking Vote  
Mauritanian President Appears on Television After Shooting  
Italian Brass for a Chinatown Goodbye  
Under Mary Wittenberg, The New York City Marathon Is Thriving. So What’s the Problem?  
Juvenile Killers and Life Terms: a Case in Point  
5 British Marines Charged With Murder in Afghan Death  
Campaigns Mine Personal Lives to Get Out Vote  
Digital Domain: Two-Step Verification Is Inconvenient, but More Secure  
Capital Ideas: Rethinking Affirmative Action  
Afghan Boys Eke Living Amid Peril at Gorge  
On Baseball: Yankees Without Jeter Is Now a Jarring Reality  
This Life: Teaching Respect to the Young Faithful  
Game 1: Tigers 6, Yankees 4 (12 Innings): For Yankees, Thrilling Rally Ends Badly  
Submarine Montpelier Collides With Aegis Cruiser San Jacinto  
Streetscapes | Broadway From 83rd to 84th Street: Streetscapes — Broadway From 83rd to 84th Street  
Tunisia Sets June Date for Presidential Elections  
G.O.P. Ticket Focuses on Crucial Ohio Votes  
Slipstream: Do-Not-Track Movement Is Drawing Advertisers’ Fire  
Upheaval Grips South Africa as Hopes for Its Workers Fade  
In California, a Grand Experiment to Rein in Climate Change  
City Room: Man and Woman Fatally Shot at Bronx Motel  
Bats: A.L.C.S. Game 1: Tigers vs. Yankees  
FiveThirtyEight: G.O.P. Senate Hopes Fade, Even as Romney's Rise, Polls Show  
Silence on Jimmy Savile Abuse Reports Plunges BBC Into Scandal  
Every town has one: a place where people gather each day to share news, to offer opinions, to talk. What's yours?  
.@nytimessports is hosting a college football watch party tonight. Join in:  Watching a game? Tweet pix w/ #NYTQuad 
Gary Collins, Host of Miss America Pageant, Dies at 74  
Stephanie Cutter Is a Messenger Who Does the Shooting for Obama  
Dear Teacher, Johnny Isn't Sick. He's Just Boycotting the Test.  
In Meningitis Outbreak, Another Death Reported  
Qaeda Leader Calls for More Protests Outside U.S. Embassies  
More Colleges Take a Leap Into Voter Registration  
U.S. Suspects Iranians Were Behind a Wave of Cyberattacks  
Spaniards Grab Deals in Bank Sell-Off of Homes  
J. K. Rowling: By the Book  
Dominique Strauss-Kahn Says Lust Is Not a Crime  
Private Security Hovers as Issue After Embassy Attack in Benghazi, Libya  
"I'm just going in circles and circles and circles and not getting anyplace."  #Longreads 
Step inside Donna's Diner, "run on a shoestring in a city that has seen better times and hopes it will again."  
Special Report: Donna's Diner, at the Corner of Hope and Worry, by  
In Honduras, Deaths Make U.S. Rethink Drug War  
China Exports Rise, Hinting at a Glimmer of a Revival  
16 Killed in Suicide Attack in Pakistan  
Glenn Hubbard Is Romney’s Go-To Economist  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 12: Romney Debate Gains Show Staying Power  
The Algonquin Table at Mayor Koch’s Place  
Game 5: Cardinals 9, Nationals 7: Three Outs From N.L.C.S., Nationals Give Up Four Runs and Lose to Cardinals  
Alabama Center Barrett Jones Adapts on Offensive Line  
On Baseball: It May Be Time to Adjust Expectations for Yankees’ Alex Rodriguez  
Missouree? Missouruh? To Be Politic In Missouri, Say Both  
I.M.F. Urges U.S. and Europe to Act Decisively on Debt  
Cracks in Maryland and Washington Voter Databases  
Frieze Art Fair in London Adds Masters Show  
Next Stop: In Plovdiv, Bulgaria, Roman Grandeur East of Italy  
Car Bombing Kills 15 in Pakistan, Police Say  
Chinese Drywall Lawsuits at a Turning Point  
City Room: Saw-whet Owl Is Delivered to New York Parks Dept.  
On Edge in Turkey as Syria War Inches Closer  
‘I’m Your Man,’ Leonard Cohen Bio by Sylvie Simmons  
Lance Armstrong’s Former Masseuse Tells of Doping  
If Joe Biden and Paul Ryan sang their debate, it might look like this video  
Lance Armstrong’s Former Massesue Tells of Doping  
Despite Thousands of Ads, Renacci and Sutton Still Feel Unheard in Ohio  
Raising Fare for Subway and Buses Is a Question of How, Not When or Why  
In Requests for Security in Libya, Focus Was on Tripoli  
Workers Cite Concerns at Firms Tied to Meningitis  
Did Biden's approach make you grin or grimace? He elicited strong reactions on both sides:  
TV research: Republicans like golf, Democrats like cartoons  
Game 5: Yankees 3, Orioles 1: Yankees Beat Orioles to Advance to A.L.C.S.  
Tim Tebow's role with the Jets remains sparse and puzzling:  
Space Shuttle Endeavour Rolls Through Los Angeles  
Sports Alert: Yankees Advance to A.L.C.S. After Defeating Orioles, 3-1 
F.T.C. Staff Prepares Antitrust Case Against Google Over Search  
Malala Yousafzai Faces New Taliban Threat  
Protesters Gather at Keystone XL Site in Texas  
Game 5: Live Analysis: A.L.D.S. Game 5, Orioles vs. Yankees  
Funeral for Noel Polanco, Unarmed Man Killed by Police  
Soda Industry Sues to Stop Bloomberg’s Sales Limits  
Violence erupts in Cairo, the space shuttle Endeavour's ground trip through Los Angeles and more pictures of the day  
Jon Rimmerman, the Garagiste Founder and Wild Raconteur of Wine  
Benching of Rodriguez Prompts Questions About His Future Role  
Libya Attack Gains Steam as Issue in Race for President  
Video: The turn Joe Biden and Paul Ryan into unintentional singers  
ARTS: The Sweet Spot | October 12, 2012  
Common Sense: Colleges and Universities Invest in Unconventional Ways  
Media Decoder: Republicans Like Golf, Democrats Prefer Cartoons, TV Research Suggests  
New Chinese Nobel Laureate Calls for Fellow Nobel Winner’s Freedom  
Partisans on Both Sides Seize on Biden’s Performance  
‘Son,’ by Lois Lowry  
DealBook: JPMorgan Quarterly Profit Rises 34%  
All the NYT fact-checks from Biden and Ryan's vice-presidential debate in one place  
Music Review: A Sentimental and Glorious Brooklyn Homecoming for Streisand  
#FF All the New York Times election news that's fit to tweet. 
Malarky; the auto industry bailout; Iran sanctions: the VP debate into 20 key moments, w/fact-checks and video  
The Tv Watch: Biden Takes off Gloves in Vice Presidential Debate  
Art Review: Ai Weiwei Survey in Washington  
Quake-Hit Haiti Gains Little as Wyclef Jean Charity Spends Much  
Ex-Senator Espada to Plead Guilty in Theft Case  
Tribes Add Powerful Voice Against Northwest Coal Plan  
European Union Wins 2012 Nobel Peace Prize  
Breaking News: European Union Wins 2012 Nobel Peace Prize 
 
Writers Pick Heirs to Today’s Classic Collector Cars  
DealBook: David Martinez in Spotlight in Battle With Billionaire  
Russia Presses Turkey for Details on Plane’s Cargo  
Hurricane-Themed Tours Curbed in New Orleans  
Advertising: Slim Jim and E.A. Give Snackers Something to Play For  
Check Point: Bipartisan Spin On Medicare Plan During Vice-Presidential Debate  
On foreign policy, Biden and Ryan differed in style but were often similar in substance  
Game 4: Orioles 2, Yankees 1, 13 Innings: Orioles Beat Yankees in Extra Innings to Tie Series  
In Biden vs. Ryan debate, no shy people onstage  
How Lance Armstrong beat cycling's drug tests  
For some younger actresses on TV, self-acceptance of their bodies is a form of defiance  
Full transcript of the Biden-Ryan vice-presidential debate:  
Biden and Ryan's aggressive quarreling in debate highlights candidates' sharp contrasts  
Panetta Warns of Dire Threat of Cyberattack on U.S.  
Laurence Pope Appointed to Envoy Post in Libya  
All the NYT fact-checks from the Biden-Ryan vice-presidential debate in one place  
Chart: Is Paul Ryan correct that 23 million people are struggling to find work?  #AskNYT 
Video: Watch the full debate between Joe Biden and Paul Ryan  
Live video now: Watch NYT reporters and editors analyzing the Biden & Ryan debate  
Fact-check: Will all U.S. troops be out of Afghanistan by 2014?  #AskNYT 
Biden: "I never say anything I don't mean. Everybody knows whatever I say I do." 
Ryan: "A debt crisis is coming. We can't keep spending and borrowing like this. We can't keep spending money we don't have." 
Fact-check: Is Ryan correct that the $787 billion stimulus suffered from waste and fraud?  #AskNYT 
Biden: "The next president will get one or two Supreme Court nominees. That's how close Roe v. Wade is." 
Fact-check: Tax increase on small businesses  #AskNYT 
Biden on abortion: "I do not believe we have a right to tell other people how to control their bodies." 
Ryan: I don't see how a person can separate their public life from their private life or their faith. 
Video clip: Ryan teases Biden for his occasional verbal gaffe  
Biden on Afghanistan: "We will leave in 2014." 
Fact-check: How will the Romney-Ryan Medicare plan work?  #AskNYT 
Video clip: Joe Biden tells Paul Ryan, "with all due respect that's a bunch of malarkey."  
Chart: Is Biden correct that Romney's tax plan is a $5 trillion tax cut?  #AskNYT 
Biden to Ryan: "Oh, now you're Jack Kennedy?" 
Fact-check: Did President Obama "raid" Medicare of $716 billion?  
Fact-check: Budget cuts and embassy security  
Ryan: "Romney's a good man. He cares about 100 percent of America." 
Chart: Is Joe Biden right that the auto bailout added 200,000 jobs?  #AskNYT 
Ryan: "I think the vice president very well knows that sometimes the words don't come out of your mouth the right way." 
Fact-check on Iran sanctions: Obama has a lot of history on his side  #AskNYT 
.@MarthaRaddatz to Biden: "What does that mean, a bunch of stuff?" 
The Caucus: Romney Offers Sharp Criticism of Obama's Handling of Libya Terrorist Attacks  
Biden on Iran sanctions: "These are the most crippling of sanctions in the history of sanctions, period. Period." 
Ryan on Iran: "They're racing towards a nuclear weapon." 
Biden: "With all due respect that 's a bunch of malarkey." 
Ryan: "What we're watching on our TV screens is the unraveling of the Obama foreign policy." 
NYT reporters and editors will answer your questions about statements Biden & Ryan make in the debate. Tweet them with #AskNYT 
NYT reporters and editors are posting fact-checks, charts and analysis at our live debate blog  
Bats: Live Analysis: Game 4 of A.L.D.S., Orioles vs. Yankees  
Follow Biden & Ryan's debate wherever you are on NYT's apps for iPad, iPhone, Android and other devices  
Live video now: Watch the full debate and NYT analysis before and after Biden vs. Ryan  
Follow for complete NYT coverage of the vs. debate 
Game 4: Nationals 2, Cardinals 1: Nationals Defeat Cardinals With Werth Homer in 9th  
Game 4: Nationals 2, Cardinals 1: Nationals Defeat Cardinals With Werth Homer in 9th  
James Levine to Return to Conducting in 2013  
Follow for fact-checks, graphics, videos and more NYT coverage of tonight's vice-presidential debate 
The Caucus: Vice-Presidential Debate Poses Challenges on Substance and Style  
Obama Fires Up a Rally in Florida  
Hungry City: Pok Pok Phat Thai on the Lower East Side  
Before Meningitis Outbreak, Injections Tied to Risks  
Harlem Redevelopment Skipped 126th Street and Park Avenue  
Watching the Biden/Ryan debate tonight? Our coverage begins at 8:30 pm ET and includes a live video stream:  
Fighting in Aleppo, Syria, a Swiss Air Force F/A-18 in flight and more pictures of the day  
The Caucus: Latinos Favor Obama by Wide Margin, Poll Finds  
Yankees’ Granderson and Orioles’ Wieters and Jones Are Slumping Too  
Buffalo Mozzarella, the Great White Whale of American Cheesemaking  
2 More Dead in Meningitis Outbreak, C.D.C. Says  
Hezbollah Says It Sent Drone Over Israel  
Movie Review: ‘Argo,’ Directed by Ben Affleck  
How Lance Armstrong Beat Cycling’s Drug Tests  
DealBook: Boom in Mortgages Is Expected to Benefit Banks' Profits  
Biden and Ryan Prepare for Debate  
Women on TV Step Off the Scale  
Yemeni Employee at U.S. Embassy in Sana Is Shot Dead  
DealBook: SoftBank of Japan Said to Near Deal for Control of Sprint  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 10: Is Romney Leading Right Now?  
Japan’s Softbank in Talks for $12.8 Billion Sprint Stake  
Japan and South Korea Seek to Strengthen Economic Ties  
Breaking News: Mo Yan, Chinese Author, Wins 2012 Nobel Prize in Literature
 
On Baseball: Slumping Rodriguez Is Center of Attention in Yankees’ Series vs. Orioles  
Lance Armstrong Draws Mixed Reception From Triathlon Community  
Chinese Company Sets New Rhythm in Port of Piraeus  
Turkey Forces Syrian Jet to Land, Deepening Rift With Moscow  
Masked Gunmen Kill U.S. Embassy Employee in Yemen  
Romney Campaign Looks to Capitalize on Image Voters Saw in Debate  
New York State Parks Use Infusion of Money Toward Backlog of Repairs  
Health Care Direction Awaits Verdict of Presidential Race  
Tony Marx’s Challenges Running the New York Public Library  
New Jersey Remains Are Linked to Harlem Girl  
Nobel Literature Prize  
Voters Give Mitt Romney Better Leadership Grades, Polls Find  
Xi’an Journal: Beating in Xi’an for Offense of Driving Japanese Car  
Oakland Journal: Oakland Art Murmur Outgrows Its Name  
Yankees 3, Orioles 2, 12 Innings: Ibanez Ties, Then Wins Game 3  
The Details: Copying Classic Designs Is the Focus of a Lawsuit Against Restoration Hardware  
After a Meningitis Death, Family Members Ask Why  
For Some Drivers, Electric Motorcycle Could Be the Best of Both Worlds  
Graphic: How your food order comes together and arrives on your doorstep  
DealBook: With Tapes, Authorities Build Criminal Cases Over JPMorgan Loss  
Lance Armstrong’s 1999 Tour de France Triumph Takes a Dark Turn  
Widening Scrutiny of Google's Smartphone Patents  
DealBook: E-Mails Cited to Back Claim That Equity Firms Colluded on Big Deals  
Bats: Live Analysis: Game 3 of the A.L.D.S., Orioles vs. Yankees  
NYT obit: Alex Karras, football behemoth and actor, dies at 77  
Giants 8, Reds 3: San Francisco Giants Beat Cincinnati Reds to Tie Series  
Vice-Presidential Debates Make Memorable Moments  
Dunford Nominated to Lead Afghanistan War  
Alzheimer’s Prevention Studies to Test Three Drugs  
City Room: Big City Book Club - Discussing 'Desperate Characters' With Paula Fox  
Crikey! Are your American mates barmy over British vernacular? reports:  
U.S. Sets Tariffs on Chinese Solar Panels  
Senator Opens Investigation of Data Brokers  
Architecture Review: Tassafaronga Village and Richardson Apartments in Bay Area  
A sculptor created a whimsical mini-golf course in his yard:  (with slide show) 
California’s Central Valley, Land of a Billion Vegetables  
The full, 202-page report on Lance Armstrong from the U.S. Anti-Doping Agency:  
A fat, mustachioed, orphan walrus finds a home:  (with photo, of course) 
Alex Karras, N.F.L. Lineman and Actor, Dies at 77  
Live video now: A preview of "Nashville" and other Fall television, the best iPhone 5 apps and more on TimesCast  
Hearing Focuses on Attack that Killed Ambassador  
House Proud: Bruce Stillman, a Minnesota Sculptor, Creates an Artistic Mini-Golf Course  
Pakistan Erupts in Anger Over Taliban’s Shooting of Malala Yousafzai  
Follow NYT reporter for updates on the doping case against Lance Armstrong. 
Doping case against Lance Armstrong includes sworn testimony from 26 people, including 11 teammates:  
Agency Details Doping Case Against Armstrong  
Breaking News: Lance Armstrong at Center of Cycling’s Most Sophisticated Doping Program, Officials Charge 
Alex Karras, Former N.F.L. Lineman and Actor, Dies at 77  
One Member of Pussy Riot Is Freed by Moscow Court  
Antidoping Agency Expected to Detail Its Case Against Lance Armstrong  
A Changed Court Revisits Affirmative Action in College Admissions  
The Lede Blog: My 'Small Video Star' Fights for Her Life  
DealBook: EADS and BAE Systems Abandon Merger Talks  
Frank Schubert and the Fight Against Marriage Rights  
Aerospace Giants EADS and BAE Systems Abandon Merger Talks  
2 American Scientists Win Nobel Prize in Chemistry  
Romney Pledges to Keep Tax Deductions for Mortgages  
Russian Court Upholds Jail for Two Pussy Riot Members but Frees Third  
‘Cloud Atlas,’ as Rendered by Tom Tykwer and the Wachowskis  
Turkey Warns Syria It May Use ‘Greater Force’  
French Terror Investigators Find Bomb-Making Materials  
Girl Shot by Taliban in Critical Condition After Surgery  
As Romney Repeats Trade Message, Bain Maintains China Ties  
Russian Court Considering Pussy Riot's Appeal  
2 U.S. Scientists Win Nobel Chemistry Prize  
Walter Johnson’s Daughter Links Washington to Its Baseball Past  
Memo From Birmingham: London’s Boris Johnson Overshadows Cameron  
Fiscal Cliff May Be Felt Gradually, Analysts Say  
French Police Find Explosives While Investigating Islamist Suspects  
Study Finds That the Number of Protestant Americans Is Declining  
City Room: New York Comic Convention Will Bring Out Costumed Fans  
U.S. Military Sent to Jordan on Syria Crisis  
Athletics 2, Tigers 0: Shutout by Athletics Cuts Tigers’ Series Lead to 2-1  
Athletics 2, Tigers 0: Anderson Pitches A’s Past Tigers to Avoid Sweep  
Meningitis Death Toll Rises to 11  
Giants 2, Reds 1: Held to Three Hits, Giants Make Them Count  
The Role of Competitiveness in Raising Healthy Children  
Obama Campaign Tells Supporters: Steady On  
FiveThirtyEight: Oct. 9: Romney Erases Obama's Convention Bounce in Forecast  
Denver’s Downtown Mall, a Headache and Draw, Reaches 30  
Orphaned Baby Walrus to Arrive at New York Aquarium  
Brazilian Corruption Case Raises Hopes for Judicial System  
After Losing St. Vincent’s Hospital, Manhattan Sees Rise in Clinic Care  
DealBook: U.S. Sues Wells Fargo, Alleging Mortgage Deceit  
Critic’s Notebook: Tasting Menus Can Be Too Much of a Good Thing  
DealBook: Wall Street Pay Remains High Even as Jobs Shrink  
Netanyahu Calls for Early Elections in Israel  
Strong Opposition to Aquarium’s Plan to Import Beluga Whales  
Man Convicted in Fraud Is Accused of Seeking Judge’s Death  
Teen School Activist, Malala Yousafzai, Survives Hit by Pakistani Taliban  
It’s the Economy: The Big Secret of the Election: Mitt Romney and Barack Obama Basically Agree on the Economy  
Black Support for Obama Uncertain in 2012  
Netanyahu Orders Israeli Elections, Eight Months Early  
Skydiver Cancels Try at Supersonic Jump  
Qaeda-Linked Group Says It Struck Compound on Edge of Damascus  
Video: The Obama campaign's new tone, looks at the polls and more on TimesCast Politics  
Books of The Times: ‘Sutton,’ by J. R. Moehringer, a Fictional Biography  
Video: A 2009 NYT documentary on the 14-year-old girl shot by the Pakistani Taliban today, part 2:  
Video: A 2009 NYT documentary on the 14-year-old girl shot by the Pakistani Taliban today, part 1:  
Television Review: ‘Nashville,’ Starring Connie Britton, on ABC  
The Lede Blog: Pakistani Activist, 14, Is Shot by Taliban  
New Obama ad stars someone big, feathery and yellow  
Sandusky Sentenced in Penn State Sex Abuse Case  
Defiant Jerry Sandusky is sentenced to 30 to 60 years in child abuse case  
Latest: Armed men said to take corpse believed to be "El Lazca," Zetas cartel leader, from funeral home  
Breaking News: Former Penn State Assistant Football Coach Jerry Sandusky Is Sentenced to 30 to 60 Years 
Schumer Opposes a Tax Overhaul, in Blow to Deficit Deal  
Taliban Attack Teenage Pakistani Activist  
#SCOTUS to hear case of Abigail Fisher, who sued U. of Texas over its affirmative action policy  
Mexican navy believes it killed "El Lazca," a founder of the Zetas drug cartel  
South Africa Reflects on Black Singer's 'Idols' Victory  
Penn State’s Sandusky to Be Sentenced  
FiveThirtyEight: A Great Poll for Romney, in Perspective  
Sentencing Day for Penn State Coach Sandusky for Child Sex Abuse  
French and U.S. Scientists Win Nobel Physics Prize  
Lens Blog: Lucas Schifres's Photos of Chinese Factory Workers  
Protesters Await Angela Merkel’s Arrival in Athens  
French, U.S. Scientists Win Nobel Prize for Physics  
Attention Disorder or Not, Children Prescribed Pills to Help in School  
DealBook: Ireland Mortgage Bill Aims to Aid Owners and Jump-Start Economy  
With New Vigor, Mitt Romney Intensifies Ohio Campaign  
North Korea Says Its Missiles Can Reach U.S. Mainland  
N.F.L. Fast Forward: Class of Rookie Quarterbacks Fascinates League  
Books of The Times: ‘Who I Am: A Memoir,’ by Pete Townshend  
Mexico Zetas  
Georgian Leader Emerges as an Enigma  
Orioles 3, Yankees 2: Bouncing Back, Orioles Beat Yankees and Tie Series  
Texans 23, Jets 17: Jets Lose to Undefeated Texans  
Orioles 3, Yankees 2: Orioles Beat Yankees to Even Division Series  
Essay: In Tigers’ Playoff Run, the Lindell A.C. is Missed  
Development Plan Near Gowanus Superfund Site Is Scorned and Celebrated  
"If you like Jackson Pollock's 'No. 1,' you may also enjoy Mark Rothko's 'No. 18.'" Algorithms in art:  
No Immigration Charges Filed Against Jose Antonio Vargas in Traffic Stop  
NBC delays season premieres of "Community" and "Whitney"  
Op-Doc Video: Shane Taylor got 25 to life for $5 worth of drugs. In California, it's 3 strikes of injustice  
The Orioles lead the Yankees 2-1. Will the Yanks come back? Follow the #NYTBats live blog  
New ‘Super PACs’ Alter Landscape for House Races  
When patents are used as swords, tech giants can stifle competition:  
Supreme Court to Hear Case on Affirmative Action  
A November certainty: We'll be left with many fewer moderate politicians next year.  
Westerners With Syrian Ties Trickle In to Help Rebels  
C.D.C. Says Thousands Exposed to Steroid Linked to Meningitis  
Confess your kitchen disasters and how you salvaged them:  
Messed up your dish? Just rename it and pretend you meant to do that:  
Bats: Upcoming: Live Coverage of Yankees-Orioles Game 2  
‘Fearless Felix’ Baumgartner to Try to Become First Sky Diver to Break Sound Barrier  
Follow the Yankees-Orioles match-up as they play the second game of the American League division series tonight:  
FiveThirtyEight: Amid Volatile Polls, Let Fundamentals and History Guide  
"can u catch an sti from kissing?" Teens use Text in the City for anonymous health questions:  
I.M.F. Lowers Its Global Growth Forecast  
The Caucus: Pew Poll Shows Romney Advancing After Debate  
Mitt Romney wiped out President Obama's lead in the latest Pew Research Center poll:  
Syria Accuses Turkey of Imperialist Delusions as Border Shelling Resumes  
Art.sy Is Mapping the World of Art on the Web  
Redefining Medicine With Apps and iPads - The Digital Doctor  
Iran Places New Restrictions on Currency Trading  
Iran Places New Restrictions on Currency Trading  
Pitcher’s Kiss Evokes Tiger Who Talked to the Ball  
Cloning and stem cell discoveries earn Nobel in medicine:  
Pool of Moderates in Congress Is Shrinking  
Social Security Death Record Limits Hinder Researchers  
The Caucus: Romney Says White House Botched Response to Benghazi Attack  
Romney calls Obama policy in Middle East mishandled in foreign policy speech  
Live video now: Warning on Chinese telecommunications firms, the future of 3-D printing and more on TimesCast Tech  
City Room: Remembering a Film About Brooklynites Who Were All About Streisand  
Behind the scenes on how "SNL" handled the presidential debate and an appearance by Big Bird:  
Worries About Lead for New York’s Garden-Fresh Eggs  
Full text of Mitt Romney's foreign policy speech:  
U.S. Panel Calls 2 Huawei and ZTE ‘National Security Threat’  
Live video now: Mitt Romney delivers remarks on foreign policy  
Lens Blog: Weighed Down by History, a Town Slides in Mexico  
Cloning and Stem Cell Discoveries Earn Nobel Prize in Medicine  
Spinning Gaffes Into Gags: Live From New York, It’s Debate Night  
U.S. Panel Says Chinese Technology Giants Pose Security Threat  
‘Duck Dynasty’ Lures a Growing Audience on A&E  
In Italy, Calabria Is Drained by Corruption  
Cyber Attackers Target Iranian Oil Platforms, Official Says  
Israel Launches Airstrikes After Attacks From Gaza  
Gurdon, Yamanaka Win Nobel Medicine Prize  
Romney Remains Vague on Foreign Policy Details  
U.S. and Philippines Start Training Exercise  
India’s Rich Benefit From Schools’ Affirmative Action  
Dunvegan Journal: Canada Highlights War of 1912, Casting U.S. as Aggressor  
YouTube to Serve Niche Tastes by Adding Channels  
Yankees 7, Orioles 2: With Late Rally, Martin and Yankees Beat Orioles  
Study Shows Autistic Children Are Likely to Wander  
Yankees 7, Orioles 2: Yankees Win Division Series Opener Over Orioles  
Hugo Chávez wins a 3rd term in Venezuela's presidential election  
Interactive: 3 Apple patents that were involved in recent lawsuits  
Graphic: Fighters in a smartphone patent war  
Breaking News: President Hugo Chavez of Venezuela Wins Re-election
 
California Fight to Ensure Marijuana Goes Only to the Sick  
For Judge in Firefighter Discrimination Case, an Evolving Opinion  
With Biden Up Next to Debate, Obama’s Aides Plot Comeback  
iEconomy: In Technology Wars, Using the Patent as a Sword  
Jerry Brown Moves to Reduce Gas Prices in California  
Clive James Translates Dante’s ‘Divine Comedy’  
Campaigns Use Social Media to Lure Younger Voters  
Nationals 3, Cardinals 2: Nationals Edge Out Cardinals With Late Rally  
The Texas Tribune: In Texas, Schools Use IDs to Track Students  
Honda Recalls Vehicles Over Fire Hazard in Door Switch  
Modern Love: When Dating Takes More Than the Click of a Mouse - Modern Love  
Kirsten Gillibrand and Wendy Long, Dartmouth Alumnae, Vie for Senate Seat  
.@NickBilton profiles the chief executive of Twitter:  
Tracking the Venezuelan presidential election? NYT's & are live-tweeting the developments. #elecciones2012 
Our Twitter list of key sources to follow today for updates on the presidential election in Venezuela:  #elecciones2012 
Romney and G.O.P. Make Inroads in Silicon Valley  
S.E.C. Regulators Turn to High-Speed Trading Firm  
A Bailout Bazooka Awaits Its Ammo  
ArtsBeat: Liam Neeson Leads Box Office With 'Taken 2'  
Cultural Studies: Helping a Gay Child to Come Out  
Nervous Expectation as Venezuela Goes to Polls  
With Military Suicides Rising, New Policies Take Shape  
The Caucus: For Both Campaigns, Time to Adjust the Message  
SpaceX to Send Rocket Holding Cargo to Space Station  
At the Hotel Wales, the Lure of Fresh Linens and a Suite Called Home  
Ethiopians Sweep Chicago Marathon  
Pat Neshek Pitches for Athletics vs. Tigers After Baby’s Death  
Gas Prices Rise Again Overnight in California  
Democrats Bet on Shift in Hispanic Numbers to Win Arizona Race  
Measure Results, Not Hours, to Improve Work Efficiency  
SungEun Grace Lee Changes Her Mind and Decides to Stay on Life Support  
Police Jumper Squads Spend Tense Hours Trying to Save People From Themselves  
Manila and Rebel Group Take Step Toward Peace Plan  
Television: ‘Chicago Fire’ and the Changing Dick Wolf  
U.S. Agrees to Let South Korea Extend Missile Range  
As More Vote by Mail, Faulty Ballots Could Impact Elections  
British Gardeners Battle Over Peat, for Bogs’ Sake  
Bloomberg Pushes a Plan to Let Midtown Soar  
Swing of Yankees’ Cano Bears Resemblance to Federer’s  
Getting Started: Getting Started – Choosing Between a Co-op and a Condo  
Scant Drug Maker Oversight in Meningitis Outbreak  
Slow-Burning Rebellion Against Chile on Easter Island  
The Agenda: Romney ‘Weed Whacker’ on Environmental Rules May Falter  
Unboxed: Making the Case for a Government Hand in Research  
Philippines and Muslim Rebels Agree on Peace Pact  
Seeking the Right to Be Female in Malaysia  
Chicago Hip-Hop’s Raw Burst of Change  
Mamie Gummer Wants to Make a Name for Herself  
Big City: For Poor Schoolchildren, a Poverty of Words  
Bo Xilai’s Former Wife Reveals Paranoid Side of a Once-Powerful Chinese Family  
Political Memo: Mitt Romney, After Debate Success, Shows Softer Side  
City Room: Body of Child Found in Yard of Long Island Home  
Live Blog | The Quad: College Football Saturday  
Death Toll From Meningitis Outbreak Rises to Seven  
Iran Denies Plan to End Nuclear Standoff  
Citing U.S. Fears, Arab Allies Limit Aid to Syrian Rebels  
Special Report: Citing U.S. Fears, Arab Allies Limit Syrian Rebel Aid
 
Talk: The Revenge of Tippi Hedren, Alfred Hitchcock’s Muse  
Scientists in Washington State Adopt Tiny Island as Climate-Change Bellwether  
Cuban Blogger Yoani Sanchez Freed From Detention  
CDC: Meningitis Outbreak Death Toll Rises to 7  
Young and Talented, Buster Posey Is the Heart of the Giants  
News Analysis: A European Union of More Nations?  
Men Extradited From Britain Appear in Court on Terrorism Charges  
Emory Confronts Legacy of Bias Against Jews in Dental School  
Political Islam and the Fate of Two Libyan Brothers  
Some in G.O.P. See Little Choice but to Back Todd Akin  
Making It Last: A Marriage Launched by ‘Dream Weaver’  
French Police Kill a Man During Antiterrorism Raid  
The Caucus: Obama and Democrats Raise $181 Million in September  
Dick Costolo of Twitter, an Improv Master Writing Its Script  
New Zealand’s Hobbit Trail  
Court Backs SungEun Grace Lee, but Doubts About Her Wishes Arise  
Butler Gets 18 Months for Stealing Pope’s Documents  
The Saturday Profile: In Catalonia, Spain, Artur Mas Is Separatist Voice  
Healthier School Lunches Face Student Rejection  
Worries Over Defense Dept. Money for ‘Hackerspaces’  
Romney Claims of Bipartisanship as Governor Face Challenge  
In Connecticut Senate Race, McMahon Fights for Female Votes  
Club Soccer Pulls at Players’ Ties to the Hometown Team  
North Korean Soldier Said to Cross Demilitarized Zone to Defect  
Theater Review: Ionesco’s ‘Rhinoceros’ at Brooklyn Academy of Music  
Burma? Myanmar? New Freedom to Debate Includes Name  
Elsie Thompson to Step Down at African Art Museum  
On Baseball: Orioles Await Yankees After Returning to Playoffs in Style  
The Times Pays Tribute to Arthur Ochs Sulzberger  
Syrian Rebels Say West Has Abandoned Them  
With N.H.L. Arenas Silent, K.H.L. Welcomes Stars and Buzz  
Accident Suspected in Agent’s Death on Mexican Border  
Cardinals 6, Braves 3: Cardinals Beat Braves, and Chipper Jones Plays His Last  
Video: Cat videos and high-brow and low-brow culture on this week's Sweet Spot  
Photos: One Fish, Two Fish, Dead Fish, New Fish  
Were the books cooked for this month's jobs report? The NYT's explains why they weren't  
High Gas Prices in California Have Drivers Scrambling  
Officials Seek Patients Exposed to Tainted Back-Pain Drug  
Video: Crisis averted! How to make rescued cake parfait  
Drink: Make Mine Manhattan  
Pig Farmers Face Pressure on the Size of the Sty  
The Caucus: Fact-Check: An 11 Percent Unemployment Rate?  
Turkey Detains 2 Tunisians in Connection With J. Christopher Stevens’s Death  
Fact-check: Is 11 percent unemployment rate claim true?  
Another Use for Home H.I.V. Test: Screening Partners  
The Caucus: Early Voting Is Restored in Ohio  
Demonstrations in Bahrain, the "culinary Olympics" start in Germany and more pictures of the day  
12,000 Striking Miners Are Fired in South Africa  
One Fish, Two Fish, Dead Fish, New Fish  
Common Sense: Apple’s Map App Could Raise Antitrust Concerns  
Economix Blog: Explaining a Big Gain in Job-Getters  
Costco Returns to the Business of Selling Fine Art  
City Kitchen: A Taste of Fall in a Bottle of Hard Cider — City Kitchen  
October Snow Falls in Minnesota  
Latest: Jobs report brings unexpected good news for Obama as Romney questions recovery  
Video: Cat videos and culture on this week's Sweet Spot  
South African Miners Are Fired for Staging a Strike  
Romney campaign and White House spar over jobs report  
Grief and Anger After Noel Polanco Is Fatally Shot by Police  
The Caucus: Jobs Report Brings Unexpected Good News for Obama  
Live video now: Why the jobless rate fell and more on Business Day Live  
Charts: How Democrats and Republicans might interpret today's jobs report  
Jobs report prompts conspiracy charge, and swift responses  
Syrian Government Forces Bombard Homs  
U.S. Added 114,000 Jobs in September; Rate Drops to 7.8%  
In Venezuela, Fears Persist Among Voters Ahead of Election  
Breaking News: U.S. Added 114,000 Jobs in September; Unemployment Rate Fell to 7.8%
 
5 things to watch for in this morning's jobs report  
Exhibition Review: Met Show Recalls Bashford Dean, Armor Curator  
‘The Yellow Birds,’ by Kevin Powers  
New Boston Busing Debate, 4 Decades After Fervid Clashes  
Entrepreneurs Starting Up With Fewer Employees  
British Judges to Rule on Extradition of 5 Detainees to U.S.  
On Baseball: In Wild-Card Play-In Game, It’s Win or You’re Out  
American Kills Worker at Israeli Hotel, Then Is Shot by Police  
Antipiracy Soldiers Stranded in Somalia  
Glut of Solar Panels Is a New Test for China  
South Korea and Japan Fight Over Rocky Islets  
Art Review: Wade Guyton at Whitney Museum of American Art  
In Texas, Cheerleaders’ Signs of Faith at Issue  
Romney Says He Was Wrong on ‘47 Percent’ Comment  
N.F.L. Roundup: With 9 Sacks, Rams Hand Cardinals Their First Loss  
Memo From Jerusalem: Concentration and Politics Hinder Israel Newspapers  
News Analysis: News Analysis: A Question of Oversight on Compounding Pharmacies  
Avella High School in Pennsylvania Regains Football Pride  
As Rial Slides, So Do Iranians’ Dreams  
Police Fatally Shoot an Unarmed Driver on the Grand Central Parkway  
Iranians Offer 9-Step Plan to End Nuclear Crisis  
For Obama and Romney, Campaign Gains New Intensity in Debate’s Wake  
F.B.I. Agents Scour Ruins of Attacked U.S. Compound in Libya  
F.B.I. Agents Scour Ruins of Attacked U.S. Compound in Libya  
The Agenda: Entering Stage Right, Romney Moved to Center  
Robin Sloan, Author and More, and His ’24-Hour Bookstore’  
Le Cirque in New York is looking to replace its chef  
Obama team tries to salvage a debate performance criticized by Democrats and Republicans alike  
Los Angeles Police to Revise Immigrant Detention Policy  
The Passage of Justin Cronin  
Political Times: Obama’s Enthusiasm Gap  
Updated: Bobby Valentine fired by Red Sox after team wins only 69 games  
F.D.A. Says Avoid Drugs From Company Tied to Meningitis  
Conflict along the Turkey-Syria border, a tiger cub at the Shanghai zoo and more pictures of the day  
N.H.L. Cancels First Two Weeks of Season  
Obama and Romney's 1st debate draws more than 70 million viewers, the most since 1980  
Movie Review: ‘The Paperboy,’ by Lee Daniels, Stars Nicole Kidman  
Sioux Race to Find Millions to Buy Sacred Land in Black Hills  
Update on  Our site is back up and running. Thanks for your patience. 
Some readers are having difficulty accessing  We are working to diagnose and fix this problem. Stand by. 
Human Rights Watch Says Its Moscow Researcher Threatened  
Nathan Sproul, an operative for the GOP, has a long trail of voter fraud claims  
Essay: Yaz's Triple Crown: Work, Resolve and Concentration – Robert Pinsky  
Pro-Muslim ads to hang near anti-Jihad ads in NYC subway stations  
The Gospel According to Pinterest  
The Caucus: On the Debate Stage, Romney the Moderate  
City Room: Unarmed Man Fatally Shot by Police on Queens Highway  
Fed Members in Accord on Bond-Buying, Minutes Show  
What I Love | Ina Garten: Ina Garten | More Square Footage for a Shoeless Cook  
Police fatally shoot unarmed man in Queens, New York highway incident  
Obama Team Tries to Change Course After Debate Disappoints  
Slide show: Historic International Herald Tribune front pages over 13 decades  #IHT125 
Red Sox Fire Bobby Valentine After One Season  
Seeking to regain momentum after first debate, Obama looks for "the Real Mitt Romney" in speech  
The Caucus: On Health Care, Two Visions With Their Own Set of Facts  
Jeffrey Eugenides: By the Book  
Google and Publishers Settle Over Digital Books  
Live video now: The reaction to last night's Obama-Romney debate on TimesCast Politics  
Google Settles With Publishers Over Digital Books  
Kids draw the news, next assignment: Spider-Man moves to Brooklyn. Submit your kids' drawings here:  
Public Enemy, Rush and Kraftwerk among eclectic list of nominees to Rock and Roll Hall of Fame  
Photos: From Mata Hari to Mao, 26 historic images from the International Herald Tribune's archives  #IHT125 (fixed link) 
Updated: Turkey's parliament authorizes further military action against Syria  
Joyeux anniversaire to the International Herald Tribune, the NYT's global edition. The Oct. 4, 1887 front page:  #IHT125 
Some passengers roll past long airport security lines by exploiting wheelchair rule  
Interactive video: Complete debate replay using fact-checks to examine assertions of Obama and Romney  
Music Review: From Chicago, a ‘Carmina’ Opens Carnegie’s Season  
After Debate, a Torrent of Criticism for Obama  
European Central Bank Leaves Interest Rates Unchanged  
Suspected U.S. Drone Said to Strike in Yemen  
In Wednesday's debate, Mitt Romney was on the offensive from the beginning.  
Video Games: Video Game Retail Sales Decline Despite New Hits  
Domestic Lives: Mark Helprin: Bumping Into the Characters  
New York State Becomes a Focus of the Fight for Congress  
On Baseball: Disappointed, Orioles Still Have a Game to Play  
For Illegal Immigrants Seeking a Reprieve, Lack of Documents Is Again a Hurdle  
In Paris, Dior, San Laurent and Their New Designers  
Syria Rebels Press Harder to Gain More Fighters  
Irving Cohen, Catskills Maître D’Hôtel Matchmaker, Dies at 95  
Turkey Strikes Back After Syrian Shelling Kills 5 Civilians  
Fashion Review: Sarah Burton’s Sweet Talk at the Alexander McQueen Show  
Q Line Inspires Weather Channel as It Names Winter Storm  
The TV Watch: Obama and Romney’s Friendly Fire  
Check Point: A Closer Look at What the Presidential Candidates Said in the Debate  
News Analysis: Debate a Clash Over Government’s Role  
Wednesday's debate was short on one-liners, zingers and personal attacks:  
Watch the full debate between Barack Obama and Mitt Romney:  
Yankees 14, Red Sox 2: Yankees Clinch A.L. East Title With Win and Orioles Loss  
Obama and Romney, in First Debate, Spar Over Fixing the Economy  
Live video now: Twitter's has social media stats from tonight's debate  
What topics, surprisingly, didn't come up in the debate? lists 7, from the 47 percent to SCOTUS:  
On Location: One Shed Fits All: A Modernist Dogtrot Reborn  
Miguel Cabrera Wins Baseball’s Triple Crown  
Our debate coverage continues now with live video analysis from the newsroom. Watch:  
Sports Alert: Tigers’ Miguel Cabrera Wins Triple Crown; First to Do So Since 1967
 
Our journalists are live fact-checking the candidates' claims:  Tweet w/ #AskNYT to request a fact-check. 
Sports Alert: Yankees Win A.L. East as Orioles Lose
 
Several readers asked if Obama's claims on Romney's $5 trillion tax cut are accurate. Answer:  #AskNYT 
A Few Passengers Use Wheelchairs to Avoid Airport Lines  
Don't know what to believe? We have a team of reporters fact-checking the debate:  
Resurfaced ’07 Talk by Obama Renews Questions on Race  
A Drought’s Toll on Farm Families  
Meningitis Outbreak Grows, With Cases in 5 States  
Follow live fact-checking here:  And submit fact-checking requests with #AskNYT. 
Submit fact-check requests with #AskNYT. We'll answer throughout the night here:  
Tonight's debate format: Six 15-minute segments, with no buzzers or 60-second rebuttal limits.  
Demolition on Hold for Wright House in Phoenix  
Critic’s Notebook: Late at Night, Comedy Gets Pointed and Political  
Rift Grows Between Netanyahu and Barak in Israel  
Mitt Romney "is more likely...to see his standing improve" after tonight's debate, writes  
Follow for fact-checks, graphics, videos and analysis of tonight's debate by NYT reporters and editors 
Obama and Romney's body language: "Waving the ball," "tilting and nodding" and what it means to voters  
Latest: Turkey fires artillery into Syria in retaliation for civilian deaths caused by earlier strike  
Video: Mobile devices in emergency room care, gutting the iPhone 5, more in TimesCast Tech.  
Baseball’s Improvised Playoff Format Has Best Teams Packing  
Bits Blog: H.P. Stock Drops as Meg Whitman Speaks  
New Test of Babies’ DNA Speeds Diagnosis  
State of the Art: Kindle’s Paperwhite E-Reader Lets There Be More Light - Review  
Bidzina Ivanishvili Rescinds Demand that the Georgian President Resign  
Before Obama and Romney Debate, a Review of Key Numbers  
Ina Drew, Jamie Dimon and JPMorgan Chase’s $6 Billion Mistake  
New, Bizarre Species of Small Dinosaur Identified  
Fan Sites for Pop Stars Settle Children’s Privacy Charges  
A New Tech Generation Defies the Odds in Japan  
Clashes Reported in Tehran as Riot Police Target Money Changers  
Interactive: What Obama and Romney's body language says to voters  
DealBook: T-Mobile Seals Deal With MetroPCS  
More Than 40 Killed as 4 Bombs Strike Major Syrian City  
Euro Watch: Euro Zone Data Point to Recession in 3rd Quarter  
Claims Likely to Surface in Debate and Facts Behind Them  
In Debate, Obama and Romney Stand on Equal Footing  
Yankees’ Raul Ibanez Again Comes Through With Big Hit  
In Struggling Nevada, the President Prepares  
Asia Economies Struggle Under Weight of Global Downturn  
Qassim Suleimani, Iran’s Master of Iraq Chaos, Still Vexes the U.S.  
M.T.A.’s Finances Have Improved, New York State Comptroller Says  
New Delhi Journal: India’s Schoolchildren Face Deadly Roadways  
N.Y. City Subpoenas Ken Burns Film on ’89 Jogger Rape  
Two Car Bombs Hit Main Square in Aleppo, Syria  
Books of The Times: ‘Spillover,’ by David Quammen, on How Animals Infect Humans  
Dance Review: ‘Flex Is Kings Live,’ at the Dumbo Arts Festival  
Salina Journal: Prairie Festival Draws Crowds to Land Institute in Kansas  
L.I. Man Is Said to Have Connected Investor With ‘Rebecca’ Producer  
Yankees 4, Red Sox 3 | 12 innings: Late-Night Drama Keeps Yankees Alone in First  
A letter to the editor from Really.  
Obama Outspend Romney on TV Ads  
Police Officer Who Shot at Amadou Diallo to Get Gun Back  
Ann Romney Takes Larger Campaign Role  
Fashion Review: Chanel, Chloé, Saint Laurent, Valentino: Fashion Review  
Critic’s Notebook: Frank Lloyd Wright House in Phoenix Faces Bulldozers  
No one has seen Rep. Jesse Jackson Jr. for months, but he's likely to be re-elected in November  
Meningitis Cases Are Linked to Steroid Injections  
Marlins’ Adam Greenberg Strikes Out in Second At-Bat Chance  
Inquiry Cites Flaws in Regional Counterterrorism Offices  
Unforgettable Debate Moments  
Social media shopping sites turn word of mouth into revenue  
U.S. is said to be preparing potential targets tied to Libya Attack  
Athletics, Trying to Build for Future, Land in the Playoffs  
Two great baseball stories meet tonight: and Follow the Mets-Marlin live blog  
At Least 25 Are Killed at Nigerian College  
Republican Party Aims to Remake Florida Supreme Court  
A Buddhist temple burned in Bangladesh, Indian children dressed as Mahatma Gandhi and more pictures of the day  
Seven New York Restaurants Retain Michelin’s 3-Star Ratings  
Stanley Tucci: Actor, Writer, Family Cook  
A letter to the editor from Really.  
Pope’s Former Butler Admits in Court to Leaking Confidential Documents  
Vote here for the presidential campaign debate moment you find most unforgettable  
In Illinois, Jackson Runs Unseen  
One Border Patrol Agent Killed, Another Injured in Arizona  
Fashion Review: Paris Fashion Week: At Givenchy, Coming Up for Air, and Taking a Step Forward  
Wheels: With Addition of 573,000 Accords, Total Number of Hondas Recalled for Fire Hazard Reaches 1.1 Million  
Is the presidential race tightening ahead of the debates? looks at the polls  
Shopping Sites Pay Contributors Who Drive Traffic to Retailers  
Live video: Romney seeks line of attack, Jesse Jackson Jr.'s invisible run for re-election and more TimesCast Politics  
U.S. Said to Be Preparing Potential Targets Tied to Libya Attack  
Syrian State TV Lashes Out at Hamas Leader, Khaled Meshal  
When dairy farmers need to know if their cows are in heat, there's an app for that  
"The share price of Chipotle Mexican Grill is dropping like a lead burrito"  
The is trying out neighborhood crime reports in 140 characters  
Search for drugs and guns in Brooklyn turns up a 3-foot-long alligator  
Jeremy Lin on returning to the Houston Rockets: "I had a lot of fun last year, and I'm having a lot of fun now"  
Israel’s Iran Policy Appears to Shift Further Toward More Sanctions  
Prisoner Letters Offer Glimpses of Life in Solitary Confinement  
Vote for the debate moment you find most unforgettable, from Nixon vs. Kennedy to Rick Perry's "Oops"  
Million Volts for David Blaine in ‘Electrified’ Endurance Test  
Pennsylvania Judge Delays Implementation of Voter ID Law  
Updated: Georgia's incumbent president Mikheil Saakashvili concedes election to Bidzina Ivanishvili  
NYT Public Editor: Banning use of "illegal immigrant" in articles won't benefit readers  
Vatican Orders Investigation of Police for Abuse of Butler After Arrest  
French Drop Alleged Strauss-Kahn Rape Case  
Lens Blog: Brian Frank's Photographs of Mixed Martial Arts  
Homeland Security Says Border Patrol Agent Killed  
Bloomberg Soda Limits Tested at Barclays Center  
The Mitt Romney Who Might Have Been  
Texas Cases a Sign of Wider Fraud in Fishing Tournaments  
Experts See Signs of El Niño, but a Weak One  
Bain’s Offshore Strategies Grew Romneys’ Wealth  
U.S. Scales Back Plans for Afghan Peace  
Debate Moderators Are Subject to Partisan Rancor  
Jeremy Lin, Back in Houston, Already Feels at Home  
Device Sends Message to Swiss Farmer When Cow Is in Heat  
In Georgia Election, Ivanishvili Coalition Edges Ahead  
Fighting Spreads Through Syrian City as Services Vanish  
At a Brooklyn Home, Police Find Drugs, Guns and an Alligator  
Doctor Visits Drop, Census Finds  
Report Sees Less Impact in New Autism Definition  
Manhattan Apartment Sales Rose in Third Quarter, Reports Find  
Changing of the Guard: Chinese Communist Party Still Unsettled Over Changes  
Greek Government Submits Budget  
36 Confirmed Dead in Hong Kong Ferry Collision  
Phillies 2, Nationals 0: Before Loss to Phillies, Nationals Secure Playoff Spot  
Yankees 10, Red Sox 2: Yankees Rout Boston and Take Over First Place  
Critic’s Notebook: New Breed of Hunter Shoots, Eats and Writes  
Protesters’ Arrests During 2004 G.O.P. Convention Are Ruled Illegal  
Senate Leaders at Work on Plan to Avert Automatic Cuts  
Iran’s Rial Plummets Against the Dollar  
Battle Over Unions Moves to California  
"Senator, you're no Jack Kennedy." Watch this and other classic debate moments and Vote for your favorite: 
 
Does your stomach have the guts for a meal at Paris's Academy of Organ Meats?  
Video: Watch get zapped by 1 million volts from Tesla coils as he rehearses his next stunt  
Video: Reconstructing the attack on the U.S. mission in Benghazi and more on Libya in today's TimesCast  
Study finds #SCOTUS ruling on health care made law more popular but hurt the Court's esteem  
Seattle Police Department Uses Twitter to Report Crime  
Photo: Brooklyn, 1978, awaiting St. Paulinus of Nola  
Suit Accuses JPMorgan Unit of Broad Misconduct on Mortgage Securities  
A Growing Movement for Community-Supported Fisheries  
For something called "the vampire squid," a decidedly ungruesome diet  
If you were in Paris tonight, maybe the Academy of Organ Meats could be cooking your dinner  
MacArthur Fellows Named for 2012  
A ferry-tugboat accident near Hong Kong, judges in the rain in London and more pictures of the day  
Study Finds Fraud Is Widespread in Retracted Scientific Papers  
Slide show: 14 animal skulls and skeletons from Alan Dudley's collection  
Answers to your questions about applying for college scholarships  via 
Eric Hobsbawm, British Historian, Dies at 95  
As Economic Argument Sputters, Romney Broadens Focus  
Skulls Engineered to Take Hard Knocks  
Syria's foreign minister blames other countries for conflict in speech at U.N.  
Eight Dead, Dozen Missing After Hong Kong Ferry Sinks  
Video: rehearses his next stunt, getting zapped by 1 million volts from Tesla coils for 72 hours  
Slide show: Children and grandchildren of Auschwitz survivors copy their elders' tattoos  
Video: Reconstructing the attack on the U.S. mission in Benghazi, Libya, and more on today's TimesCast  
Our Generation: Older, Wiser and Not Giving Into Fear  
Eric Hobsbawm, historian and staunch British Communist, dies at 95  
Times-Picayune Publishes Last Daily Issue  
ArtsBeat: Seth MacFarlane Is to Host the Oscars  
American Express to Refund $85 Million  
Reaction to Supreme Court’s Health Decision a Rarity, Study Finds  
On Baseball: Final Week of Baseball Could Bring Spoilers, Miracles and Firsts  
If you can't beat 'em, hire 'em to host: Seth MacFarlane will host the Oscars  
While Congress disagrees about extending some tax cuts, it appears set to let the payroll tax cut expire  
Iranian news agency claims report from it mistakenly ran is essentially true  
Video: The last word with Dr. Barry Commoner, an early environmentalist, who died at age 95  
Watch: The most memorable moments in modern presidential debates, from Kennedy/Nixon to Obama/McCain  
Barry Commoner Dies at 95  
Whistle-Blower Lawyers Donate to Obama Campaign  
U.S. Military Sends Ospreys to Okinawa, Despite Fierce Opposition  
The Appraisal: Places Like Larry King’s Boyhood Home Aren’t Official Landmarks  
The end of the Times-Picayune's run as a daily newspaper gets marked in the New Orleans way  
Memorializing 100 Who Perished in Rhode Island Nightclub Blaze  
Turkey's aggressive efforts to repatriate antiquities alarm American and European museums  
Stocks Step Ahead Smartly  
Punch Sulzberger in his own words on publishing the Pentagon Papers, from  
The Caucus: Candidates Head Into Debate Week on the Attack  
Tired cries of media bias won't help Mitt Romney, writes in his column  
With Tattoos, Young Israelis Bear Holocaust Scars of Relatives  
Euro Watch: Unemployment in Euro Zone Rose to New High in August  
University of Mississippi Commemorates Integration  
Kenny’s Castaways, Greenwich Village Music Club, Is Closing  
Democratic Heidi Heitkamp Is Strong in G.O.P. North Dakota  
On Golf: Ryder Cup: For Jim Furyk, Dreams of Deciding the Ryder Cup, but Not This Way  
Lens Blog: Poulomi Basu's Photos of Women Serving the Border Security Patrol  
Pussy Riot Hearing Is Postponed by Moscow Court  
DealBook: Xstrata Board Supports Glencore's Revised Offer  
Payroll Tax Cut Unlikely to Survive Into Next Year  
Suicide Bomber Kills 13 in Afghanistan  
Brookfield Office Properties’ Free Arts Programs  
Georgians Prepare for Parliamentary Elections  
Afghan Bomber Kills 11, Including 3 NATO Troops  
On Pro Football: With Regular N.F.L. Officials, a Return to Normalcy With a Few Hiccups  
Charter City Plan to Fight Honduras Poverty Loses Initiator  
Eagles 19, Giants 17: On Final Play, Giants Fall Short to Eagles  
Eagles 19, Giants 17: Eagles Hold On to Beat Giants  
The Lede Blog: Iranian News Agency Claims Onion Report It Ran by Mistake Is Essentially True  
Video: The most memorable moments in modern presidential debates, from Kennedy/Nixon to Obama/McCain  
With New Delays, a Growing Sense That Gov. Andrew Cuomo Will Not Approve Gas Drilling  
Mistaken Sense of Security Cited Before Envoy to Libya Died  
Candidates Prepare for Debate as Libya Criticism Intensifies  
‘Janeane From Des Moines,’ Mock Documentary, Hits the Right  
Books of The Times: ‘Total Recall,’ by Arnold Schwarzenegger With Peter Petre  
California Bans Therapies to ‘Cure’ Gay Minors  
Microsoft Sends Engineers to Schools to Encourage the Next Generation  
Ryder Cup: Europe 14 1/2, United States 13 1/2: Europe Rallies for Stunning Victory at Ryder Cup  
Disruptions: Your Brain on E-Books and Smartphone Apps  
Ryder Cup: Europe Retains the Ryder Cup  
Sports Alert: Europe Rallies to Beat United States, Retaining the Ryder Cup 
Golden Dawn’s Popularity Rising Rapidly in Greece  
Yankees 9, Blue Jays 6: Yankees Rally Past Blue Jays to Stay in First  
49ers 34, Jets 0: Jets, Routed by 49ers, Lose Holmes to Injury  
For Daniel Hauben, ‘Bruegel of the Bronx,’ Thrilling Exposure in an Art Commission  
Marriage Seen Through a Contract Lens  
Cyberattacks on 6 American Banks Frustrate Customers  
Bo Xilai’s Son Defends Him as Upright and Devoted  
Political Memo: Using Debates to Turn Electoral Tide: Difficult but Not Impossible  
ArtsBeat: 'Hotel Transylvania' Leads Weekend Box Office  
Music Review: Global Citizen Festival, With Neil Young, to Combat Poverty  
FiveThirtyEight: As Iowa Goes, So Go Romney’s Chances?  
Pension Dilemma in Europe's Debt Crisis  
News Analysis: To Encourage Biking, Cities Forget About Helmets  
Koch Brother Embroiled in Colorado Land Dispute  
Another Wave of Bombings Across Iraq  
How Do You Get a Key to Gramercy Park?  
Big City: In the Bronx, Throwing $97 Million Down 18 Holes  
FiveThirtyEight: Poll Averages Have No History of Consistent Partisan Bias  
Meg Whitman’s Toughest Campaign: Retooling Hewlett-Packard  
Ending Segregation of the Mentally Disabled  
The Agenda: Romney Energy Agenda Shifted  
Fusion Project Faces a Frugal Congress  
Modern Love: Competing With Another Woman, or at Least a Voice – Modern Love  
Changing of the Guard : Aiming for Top, Xi Forged Ties Early in China  
Suspected Insider Attack in Afghanistan Kills 5  
Washington Nationals’ Charms Proved Hard to Ignore  
Alicia Keys Goes From Spark to Fire  
Suspected Insider Attack in Afghanistan Kills 2  
Ex-South Korea Leader Haunts Daughter’s Presidential Bid  
Tension, but No Violence, as Protestants Parade in Belfast  
Cabaret, and a Convention, Enter New Era  
Georgian Vote a Test of the 2003 Rose Revolution  
Digital Domain: Flightfox Lets the Crowd Find the Best Airfares  
New Mexico Offers Look at U.S. Elections of the Future  
Americans Keep Rolling in Ryder Cup Foursomes  
Fleeing Syrians Struggle in Countryside Amid Indiscriminate Violence  
Essay: Essay — The Honorable Clan of the Long-Distance Runner  
Blue Jays 3, Yankees 2: Yankees Playoff Drive Sputters in Loss to Jays  
Bound to sea but buried in debt, Spain's fishermen blame E.U. policies  
Global Citizen Festival  
New Virus May Be Dangerous but Seems Not Easily Spread  
The New Stars in Republican Commercials Attacking Obama: Babies  
Capital Ideas: Obamanomics: A Counterhistory  
Strict Message on Gays Seen in Choice of Bishop  
Fender guitar company aims to stay plugged in amid changing music trends  
Supreme Court Faces Crucial Cases in New Session  
In Los Angeles, Another Warning About Road Closure  
Fire sweeps through ancient souk of Aleppo, the Syrian city's soul  
Canadian Held at Guantánamo Bay Is Repatriated  
Photo: Arthur O. Sulzberger answering questions at a 1971 news conference about & the Pentagon Papers  
Slide show: Arthur O. Sulzberger in childhood, as a Marine and as publisher of The New York Times  
Video: Remembering Arthur O. Sulzberger, who expanded the sections of & printed the Pentagon Papers  
Breaking News: Arthur O. Sulzberger, Publisher Who Transformed The Times, Dies at 86
 
Music Review: Jay-Z Comes Home to Open an Arena in Brooklyn  
Apple Apologizes for Misstep on Maps  
Overrun by Crime, Camden Trades In Its Police Force  
Romney Compares Obama Presidency to Carter’s  
Cramming and Pruning for First Presidential Debate  
Kurds to Pursue More Autonomy in a Fallen Syria  
T.S.A. Is Finding More Guns at Airport Security Checkpoints  
Somalia's Al Shabaab Rebels Pull Out of Kismayu Bastion  
Ryder Cup: United States 5, Europe 3: Ryder Cup — Tiger Woods Struggles, but Americans Lead  
Fashion Review: Dior, Lanvin, Hussein Chalayan, Roland Mouret: A Fashion Review  
News Analysis: China Alters Its Strategy in Dispute With Japan  
Training for Consulate Attacks, in Case There’s a Next Time  
Palestinian Flutist Gets Rare Chance to Study in West  
Museum Review: Computer History Museum in Mountain View, Calif.  
Juan Carlos I Seeks Redemption, for Spain and Monarchy  
Yankees 11, Blue Jays 4: Keeping Pace With Orioles, Yankees Beat Blue Jays  
Democrats Duke It Out in the San Fernando Valley  
Romney, Appealing to Wider Audience, Recalibrates Message  
Media Decoder: Baton Rouge Newspaper Sees an Opportunity in New Orleans  
Seahawks’ Towering Secondary Is Batting Away Conventional Wisdom  
Shifting Reports on Libya Killings May Cost Obama  
Photos: Peek inside the writers' rooms of &  
Junot Díaz: "It's like you spend 16 years chefing in the kitchen, and all that's left is an amuse-bouche"  
Quentin Tarantino is inspired by Westerns where "The bad guys win...and that's the end of the movie."  
That loaded gun in my carry-on? Oops, forgot.  
Video: explains how what inspired "Girl on Fire"  
What makes "Homeland" different from "24?" The show's creators explain  via 
Chinese Company Ordered to Give Up Stake in Wind Farms Near Navy Base  
DealBook: Judge Strikes Down Dodd-Frank Trading Rule  
News Analysis: How to Help Iran Build a Bomb  
News Analysis: How to Help Iran Build a Bomb  
F.C.C. Approves Auction Process for Spectrum  
Communities Curb Use of Paper and Plastic Shopping Bags  
Barclays Center’s Opening Is Met With Protests  
As it followed a car chase, Fox News showed a man shoot himself:  
Photos: Peek inside the writer's rooms of &  
White House move to give Egypt $450 Million in aid meets resistance  
Stocks Down for the Day, Up for the Quarter  
Spain Needs €60 Billion for Its Banks, Audit Finds  
Michael Chabon explains how the O.J. Simpson trial inspired his book "Telegraph Avenue"  
Latest: Dolphin that was stranded on Queens beach dies following rescue effort  
Full Count: A Tag Play at Home, the Dirtiest Part of a Catcher’s Job  
Great moments in inspiration for Anthony Brownstein, and more  
On the Runway Blog: Raf Simons and the Remapping of Dior  
Netanyahu's Bomb Diagram Stirs Confusion in Israel  
Dolphin is rescued after washing ashore in Queens, New York  via 
Hollande’s New Budget Focuses on Cutting France’s Deficit  
Quentin Tarantino is inspired by Westerns where "The bad guys win...and that's the end of the movie."  
Vatican Says Papyrus Referring to Jesus’ Wife Is Probably Fake  
ARTS: The Sweet Spot | September 28, 2012  
Common Sense: For Americans, Wealth Isn’t a Clear Indicator of Voting Behavior  
Watch: explains how she made "Girl on Fire"  
Spain's Banks May Need 59.3 Billion Euro in Extra Capital  
The creators of "Homeland" explain what makes the show different from "24"  via 
Timeline: Obama administration statements on the attack on the U.S. mission in Benghazi, Libya  
Rhode Island Father-Daughter Dance Stirs Sex-Discrimination Dispute  
France Unveils a Budget Heavy on Taxes  
New York Area Longshoremen Seeing Jobs Dwindle From Automation  
Theater Review: Adam Rapp’s ‘Through the Yellow Hour,’ at Rattlestick  
Bits Blog: Tim Cook Apologizes for Apple's Maps  
FiveThirtyEight: Sept. 27: The Impact of the '47 Percent'  
Security Fears Hobble Inquiry of Libya Attack  
U.N. Council Strengthens Panel Investigating Abuses in Syria  
DealBook: Bank of America to Pay $2.43 Billion to Settle Class Action Over Merrill Deal  
‘Gospel of Jesus’ Wife’ Fragment Is a Fake, Vatican Says  
Aqueduct Racing Officials Faulted in Horse Deaths  
Bo Xilai Expelled from China’s Communist Party  
China Says Disgraced Leader Bo Expelled From Party  
Plane Going to Mount Everest Region Crashes, Killing 19  
Militants Attack Iraqi Prison and Kill 15 Police Officers  
Breaking News: China Says Bo Xilai Expelled From Communist Party and Will Face Criminal Charges
 
Critic’s Notebook: New York Film Festival at Lincoln Center  
Veterans Wait for U.S. Aid Amid Growing Backlog of Claims  
Iraq Prison Break Kills 10 Guards, 2 Inmates  
The TV Watch: ‘Homeland’ Season 2 Begins on Showtime  
Obama Takes Advantage of Romney’s Lack of Details  
F.T.C. Moves to Tighten Online Privacy Protections for Children  
Former Met Keith Hernandez Shaves His Mustache for Charity  
Kenya Says It Captures Last Islamist Bastion in Somalia  
Fashion Review: Balenciaga, Rochas, Rick Owens, Dries Van Noten, Branquinho: Fashion Review  
Kenya Says Somali Rebel City Falls as Fighting is Reported  
High & Low Finance: The Myth of Fixing the Libor - High & Low Finance  
Hanoi Journal: Hanoi Traffic Daunts Tourists  
Minneapolis Office Shooter Kills 4, Then Self, Police Say  
Plane Going to Everest Region Crashes, Killing 19  
N.F.L.’s Replacement Referees Wake Up From a Dream  
A Flood of Applications, With a Trickle of Approvals  
New Enrollment Drops Again in U.S. Graduate Schools  
N.H.L. Labor Talks to Resume Friday  
United States Economy Still Weak, but More Feel Secure  
Libya Attack Investigation Hobbled by Security Fears  
Ammunition for a Trade War Between U.S. and Mexico  
Probation Hearing for Man Tied to Anti-Islam Video  
Rushing to Get N.F.L.’s Regular Referees Back on Field  
Fashion Review: Fashion’s Young Guns Show Paris a Dark Side  
DealBook: British Authorities to Announce Changes in Libor Oversight  
Raising Frogs for Freedom, Prison Project Opens Doors  
M.T.A. Amends Rules After Pro-Israel Ads Draw Controversy  
California Man Linked to Anti-Islam Film in Custody: Court Spokesman  
America has the "47 percent." In New York City it's the "35 percent"  
South Sudan and Sudan Reach Deal on Oil Exports  
Barclays Center, a Rival for Madison Square Garden  
We asked what you thought Brooklyn's looks like, and here's what you told us:  
DealBook: Prudential to Acquire Life Business from Hartford  
Students demonstrate in Santiago, Chile, preparations for Sukkot in Jerusalem and more pictures of the day  
Watch: "The potential for violence awaits around every corner" visits rebels in Idlib, Syria  
The Caucus: Soros Gives $1 Million to Democratic ‘Super PAC’  
Mets 6, Pirates 5: R.A. Dickey Wins 20th Game for the Mets  
Knuckleballer wins his 20th game of the season for the Mets  #knuckleball 
George Soros donates $1 million to Democratic "Super PAC"  
After looking at Apple Maps app's problems, David explains what makes Google Maps so good  
How connected are comedy and horror? More from series on "shock values"  
Iran Close to Making a Bomb, Netanyahu Says  
Spain Unveils Sweeping Budget Cuts  
Photo: Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel displayed a diagram at the U.N. on Thursday  
Decorated General Charged With Violations of Military Law  
Philippine Priest Facing Scrutiny Over Ivory and Abuse  
Hungry City: Blue Ribbon Sushi Izakaya in the Lower East Side  
The Caucus: Before a Single Debate, Iowans Start Voting for President  
Photo: Sheep graze in New York City's Bryant Park  
Watch now: Early voting makes every day election day, what Florida voters say and more TimesCast Politics  
Spain Budget Concentrates on Spending Cuts Over Revenue  
Israeli Foreign Ministry Calls for More Sanctions on Iran  
College bars struggle as students rely on social media to tell them where, and when, to go out  
Why is your hair going gray? The Booming blog explains  
Slide show: The many problems with Apple's Maps app  
"Plan X" and other U.S. cyberwarfare programs come out of the shadows  
John R. Silber, Who Led Boston University’s Renaissance, Dies at 86  
10 missed calls by the NFL's replacement referees that we won't miss  
Rosa Jimenez's murder conviction becomes a rallying cry for unequal treatment of immigrants  
J.K. Rowling's 'The Casual Vacancy' reviewed: "This is definitely not a book for children..."  
Election Will Decide Future of Interrogation Methods for Terrorism Suspects  
Herbert Lom, Frustrated Boss of Inspector Clouseau, Dies at 95  
NYT names Deborah Needleman to run  
U.N. Says Syrian Refugee Numbers Are Surging  
Last Quarter’s Growth Is Revised Down Sharply  
Herbert Lom, ‘Pink Panther Actor,’ Dies  
DealBook: Cerberus to Sell $2.5 Billion Stake in Japanese Bank  
Euro Watch: Data Point to Further Gloom in Euro Zone  
Up to 700,000 Syrians Could Flee by Year’s End, Refugee Agency Says  
Ex-Credit Suisse Trader Arrested in Britain  
Question Mark: Why Hair Turns Gray  
Case of Rosa Jimenez Becomes Symbol of Unequal Treatment of Immigrants  
For Developer Bruce Ratner, Nets Purchase Aided Atlantic Yards Project  
Toyota Moves to Revamp Its Lexus Line  
‘Super PACs’ Finally a Draw for Democrats  
Mom and Pop Stores, the Brooklyn Generation  
U.S. Officials Opening Up on Cyberwarfare  
Zetas Drug Trafficker Is Captured, Mexico Says  
The Details: In Praise of British Design  
Bavaria Political Shifts Could Have Wide Effects  
Book Review: ‘The Casual Vacancy’ by J. K. Rowling  
Budget Cuts to Close Georgia Archives to the Public  
N.F.L. Reaches Labor Deal With Officials  
Breaking News: N.F.L. and Referees Union Agree on Deal to End Lockout
 
Seeking cures, patients enlist mice stand-ins:  
City Room: Dear Waldorf, Mummy Stole Your Teapot Back in 1935. So Sorry.  
Using a social media rating to help people, not judge them:  
Police Search Harriman State Park in Hunt for Eugene Palmer  
What went wrong with Apple's Maps, and when will it be fixed? explains:  
Romney Ad Stresses Compassion for Poor  
Rebels Make Gains in Blunting Syrian Air Attacks  
In a reversal, traffic deaths rise in New York City:  
Analysis: Boogaard’s Lawsuit May Shake Up Hockey  
Video: California legalizes Google's driverless cars, and a chat with Hewlett-Packard's Meg Whitman.  
For College Students, Social Media Tops the Bar Scene  
In Further Opening, U.S. to Ease Ban on Imports From Myanmar  
Arizona Ski Resort’s Sewage Plan Creates Uproar  
Countries used to emulate U.S. stock markets. Now America is a model for what to avoid:  
Russians Eagerly Participating in Medical Experiments, Despite Risks  
Is Alzheimer's Type 3 diabetes?  
China’s Politics Hinder Effort to Shore Up Economy  
The rare triple crown is within reach. Can Miguel Cabrera do it?  
Stuyvesant students describe the how and the why of cheating:  
‘Plebs’ Insult by British Official Stirs Controversy  
Economic Scene: Obama and Romney’s ‘Redistribution’ Debate Has a Gray Area  
Photos of the Day:  
How many of these 21 government programs have you benefited from?  
.@JuliaPrestonNYT, immigration correspondent, on use of the term "illegal immigrant"  
The Inspiration Issue: The Creators of ‘Homeland’ Exorcise the Ghost of ‘24’  
Wall Street Turns Negative  
Video: California legalizes Google's driverless cars, and a chat with Hewlett-Packard's Meg Whitman.  
Clinton Cites Clear Link Between Al Qaeda and Attack in Libya  
U.N. Speech by Mahmoud Ahmadinejad Lacks Fire of Years Past  
Beyond Wall St., Curbs on High-Speed Trading Advance  
Critic's Notebook: Does Louisville Need More Highways?  
N.F.L. and Referees Are Close to a Deal  
Breaking News: N.F.L. Reported Close to Deal to Bring Back Referees 
In a Wiltshire garden, 2,000 varieties of roses and 6 clothing-optional days:  
Google is working on Maps for iPhone and iPad, but it'll likely be a few months:  
Andy Williams, Crooner of ‘Moon River,’ Dies at 84  
In Reversal, New York City Traffic Fatalities Rise  
Lens Blog: The Work of Chilean Photographer Tomás Munita  
Japan’s Opposition Picks Nationalist Ex-Premier as Leader  
South African Firebrand Charged With Money Laundering  
On Pro Basketball: On Pro Basketball — Nets Have Big Goals and Audacious Dreams  
In Afghanistan, U.S. Advisers Train Ally With Armor On  
Mice as Stand-Ins in the Fight Against Disease  
Barnes & Noble Tablets Aim for Niche Below iPad  
Andy Coulson and Rebekah Brooks to Appear in Court  
Greece Faces National Strike to Protest Austerity  
Obama Faces Test as Deficit Stays Above $1 Trillion  
Stuyvesant Students Describe Rationale for Cheating  
Square Feet: Manufacturing Space in Brooklyn Retools for the Modern Tenant  
Polls Show Obama Widening Lead in Ohio and Florida  
syria  
Advertising: NBC Unpacks Trove of Viewer Data From London Olympics  
Shinzo Abe, Ex-Premier, Becomes President of Japan’s Opposition Party  
Two Explosions Reported Near Damascus Army Building  
Two Explosions Reported Near Damascus Army Building  
Pirates 10, Mets 6: David Wright Joins Ed Kranepool Atop Mets’ Hits List  
Miguel Cabrera Tantalizingly Close to Triple Crown  
Books of The Times: ‘The Forgiven,’ by Lawrence Osborne  
Twins 5, Yankees 4: Yankees Lose Lead and Chance to Expand Playoff Edge  
Bits Blog: Google Working on Maps for iPhone, iPad  
Merchandise Mart in Chicago Attracts Tech Start-Ups  
Immigrant Deportation Deferrals Put Employers in a Bind  
In the Bronx, Resistance to Prosecuting Stop-and-Frisk Arrests  
Romney and Ryan to Start Campaigning Together More Often  
On Pro Football: N.F.L. Commissioner Goodell Caught Between Bad Calls and Owners  
Bombs Explode at Damascus School Said to Be a Military Center  
On an Island in Georgia, Slave Descendants Known as Geechees Fear Losing Land to Soaring Taxes  
Malmesbury Journal: Clothing-Optional Days Add to English Garden’s Appeal  
Roma settlements demolished in Bulgaria, Israel prepares for Yom Kippur and more pictures of the day  
City Room: Eighth Grader Says he Vandalized Grimm's Office  
A Dance Critic’s Most Shocking Moment  
